Connecticut, session 2026, HB05003.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-307 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) If any injury for which compensation is provided under the
provisions of this chapter results in total incapacity to work, the injured
employee shall be paid a weekly compensation equal to seventy-five per
cent of the injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the date of
the injury, calculated pursuant to section 31-310, after such earnings
have been reduced by any deduction for federal or state taxes, or both,
and for the federal Insurance Contributions Act made from such
employee's total wages received during the period of calculation of the
employee's average weekly wage pursuant to section 31-310; but the
compensation shall not be more than the maximum weekly benefit rate
set forth in section 31-309 for the year in which the injury occurred. No
employee entitled to compensation under this section shall receive less
than twenty per cent of the maximum weekly compensation rate, as
provided in section 31-309, provided the minimum payment shall not
exceed seventy-five per cent of the employee's average weekly wage, as
determined under section 31-310, and the compensation shall not

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
continue longer than the period of total incapacity.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
any employee who suffers any injury or illness caused by the employer's
violation of any health or safety regulation adopted pursuant to chapter
571 or adopted by the federal Occupational Safety and Health
Administration and listed in 29 CFR, Chapter XVII, after the violation
has been cited in accordance with the provisions of section 31-375 or the
provisions of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 84 Stat.
1601 (1970), 29 USC 658 and not abated within the time fixed by the
citation, provided the citation has not been set aside by appeal to the
appropriate agency or court having jurisdiction, shall receive a weekly
compensation equal to one hundred per cent of the employee's average
weekly earnings at the time of the injury or illness.
(c) The following injuries of any person shall be considered as causing
total incapacity and compensation shall be paid accordingly: (1) Total
and permanent loss of sight of both eyes, or the reduction to one-tenth
or less of normal vision; (2) the loss of both feet at or above the ankle; (3)
the loss of both hands at or above the wrist; (4) the loss of one foot at or
above the ankle and one hand at or above the wrist; (5) any injury
resulting in permanent and complete paralysis of the legs or arms or of
one leg and one arm; (6) any injury resulting in incurable imbecility or
mental illness.
(d) An employee who has suffered the loss or loss of the use of one of
the members of the body, or part of one of the members of the body, or
the reduction of vision in one eye to one-tenth or less of normal vision,
shall not receive compensation for the later injury in excess of the
compensation allowed for the injury when considered by itself and not
in conjunction with the previous incapacity except as provided in this
chapter.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-308 and subsection
Public Act No. 26-12 2 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(a) of this section, if any injury for which compensation is provided
under the provisions of this chapter results in total or partial incapacity
to work as a result of any physical or negligent assault upon a health
care provider or other employee of a health care facility or institution
while such health care provider or other employee was acting in the
discharge of such health care provider's or other employee's duties
within the scope of such health care provider's or other employee's
employment or under the direction of such health care provider's or
other employee's employer, the injured health care provider or other
employee shall be paid a weekly compensation equal to one hundred
per cent of the injured health care provider's or other employee's
average weekly earnings as of the date of the injury, calculated pursuant
to section 31-310, provided the provisions of section 31-309 shall not
apply to such weekly compensation. Such weekly compensation shall
additionally include payment for any (1) expenses reasonably incurred
by such health care provider or other employee for medical or other
services necessary as a result of such assault, or (2) lost wages due to an
absence due to a court appearance in connection with such assault. Any
health care provider or other employee absent from employment as a
result of injury sustained during an assault or for a court appearance in
connection with such assault shall continue to receive such health care
provider's or other employee's full salary, while so absent, except that
the amount of any workers' compensation award may be deducted from
salary payments during such absence. The time of such absence shall
not be charged against such health care provider's or other employee's
sick leave, vacation time or personal leave days. For purposes of this
subsection, "health care provider" means an individual directly or
indirectly employed by, or volunteering for, a health care facility or
institution and who (A) is involved in direct patient care, or (B) has
direct contact with the patient or patient's family when either (i)
collecting or processing information for patients forms and records, or
(ii) escorting or directing the patient or patient's family on the health
care employer's premises, and "health care facility or institution" means
Public Act No. 26-12 3 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
a hospital, nursing home, rest home, home health care agency, home
health aide agency, emergency medical services organization, assisted
living services agency, outpatient clinic, outpatient surgical facility,
community health center, urgent care facility, medical office owned or
operated exclusively by a person or persons licensed pursuant to section
20-13, dental office and infirmary operated by an education institution
for the care of students enrolled in, and faculty and employees of, such
institution. "Health care facility or institution" does not include any
facility or institution operated by the state, except The University of
Connecticut Health Center.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-308 and subsection
(a) of this section, if any injury for which compensation is provided
under the provisions of this chapter results in total or partial incapacity
to work as a result of any physical or negligent assault upon any
member of a board of education, the State Board of Education, the Board
of Regents of Higher Education or the Board of Trustees for The
University of Connecticut or any teacher employed by such boards or
other employee of such boards while such member, teacher or other
employee was acting in the discharge of such member's, teacher's or
other employee's duties within the scope of such member's, teacher's or
other employee's employment or under the direction of such member's,
teacher's or other employee's employer, the injured member, teacher or
other employee shall be paid a weekly compensation equal to one
hundred per cent of the injured member's, teacher's or other employee's
average weekly earnings as of the date of the injury, calculated pursuant
to section 31-310, provided the provisions of section 31-309 shall not
apply to such weekly compensation. Such weekly compensation shall
additionally include payment for any (1) expenses reasonably incurred
by such member, teacher or other employee for medical or other services
necessary as a result of such assault, or (2) lost wages due to an absence
due to a court appearance in connection with such assault. Any member,
teacher or other employee absent from employment as a result of injury
Public Act No. 26-12 4 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
sustained during an assault or for a court appearance in connection with
such assault shall continue to receive such member's, teacher's or other
employee's full salary, while so absent, except that the amount of any
workers' compensation award may be deducted from salary payments
during such absence. The time of such absence shall not be charged
against such member's, teacher's or employee's sick leave, vacation time
or personal leave days. For purposes of this subsection, "teacher" and
"other employee" include any student completing a student teaching
experience under the direction of a teacher employed by a local or
regional board of education or by the State Board of Education or Board
of Governors or Higher Education, and any member of the faculty or
staff or any student employment by The University of Connecticut
Health Center or health services.
Sec. 2. Section 31-40z of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Benefits" means health insurance benefits, retirement benefits,
fringe benefits, paid leave and any other compensation other than
wages to be offered with a position;
[(1)] (2) "Employer" means any individual, corporation, limited
liability company, firm, partnership, voluntary association, joint stock
association, the state and any political subdivision thereof and any
public corporation within the state using the services of one or more
employees for pay;
[(2)] (3) "Employee" means any individual employed or permitted to
work by an employer;
[(3)] (4) "Wages" means compensation for labor or services rendered
by an employee, whether the amount is determined on a time, task,
piece, commission or other basis of calculation; and
Public Act No. 26-12 5 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
[(4)] (5) "Wage range" means the range of wages an employer
[anticipates relying on when setting wages] sets in good faith for a
position, and may include reference to any applicable pay scale,
previously determined range of wages for the position, actual range of
wages for those employees currently holding comparable positions or
the employer's budgeted amount for the position.
(b) No employer shall:
(1) Prohibit an employee from disclosing or discussing the amount of
[his or her] such employee's wages or the wages of another employee of
such employer that have been disclosed voluntarily by such other
employee;
(2) Prohibit an employee from inquiring about the wages of another
employee of such employer;
(3) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document that
denies the employee [his or her] such employee's right to disclose or
discuss the amount of [his or her] such employee's wages or the wages
of another employee of such employer that have been disclosed
voluntarily by such other employee;
(4) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document that
denies the employee [his or her] such employee's right to inquire about
the wages of another employee of such employer;
(5) Inquire or direct a third party to inquire about a prospective
employee's wage and salary history unless a prospective employee has
voluntarily disclosed such information, except that this subdivision
shall not apply to any actions taken by an employer, employment
agency or employee or agent thereof pursuant to any federal or state law
that specifically authorizes the disclosure or verification of salary
history for employment purposes. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
an employer from inquiring about other elements of a prospective
Public Act No. 26-12 6 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
employee's compensation structure, as long as such employer does not
inquire about the value of the elements of such compensation structure;
(6) Discharge, discipline, discriminate against, retaliate against or
otherwise penalize any employee who discloses or discusses the
amount of [his or her] such employee's wages or the wages of another
employee of such employer that have been disclosed voluntarily by
such other employee;
(7) Discharge, discipline, discriminate against, retaliate against or
otherwise penalize any employee who inquires about the wages of
another employee of such employer;
(8) Fail or refuse to provide an applicant for employment the wage
range for a position for which the applicant is applying and a general
description of the benefits to be offered with such position, if such
position has not been made available to an applicant pursuant to an
internal or public job advertisement, upon the earliest of (A) the
applicant's request, or (B) prior to [or at the time the applicant is made
an offer of compensation; or] any discussion of compensation with the
applicant or an offer of compensation to the applicant;
(9) Fail or refuse to provide an employee the wage range for the
employee's position and a general description of the benefits to be
offered with such position upon (A) the hiring of the employee, (B) a
change in the employee's position with the employer, or (C) the
employee's first request for a wage range;
(10) Fail or refuse to disclose in an internal or public job
advertisement for a position the wages or wage range for such position
and a general description of the benefits to be offered with such position;
or
(11) Retaliate or discriminate against an applicant or employee,
including, but not limited to, refusing to interview or hire a prospective
Public Act No. 26-12 7 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
employee, refusing to promote an employee or terminating an
employee for exercising such applicant's or employee's rights under this
section.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any employer
or employee to disclose the amount of wages paid to any employee.
(d) An action to redress a violation of subsection (b) of this section
may be maintained in any court of competent jurisdiction by any one or
more employees or prospective employees. An employer who violates
subsection (b) of this section may be found liable for compensatory
damages, attorney's fees and costs [, punitive damages] and such legal
and equitable relief as the court deems just and proper.
(e) [No action shall be brought for any] An action for a violation of
subsection (b) of this section [except within] may be brought not later
than two years after such violation.
(f) The provisions of this section shall apply to any position in which
the duties of such position will be performed within the state or in which
the duties for such position will be performed outside of the state but
requires the employee performing such duties to report directly to a
supervisor, office or other worksite located within the state.
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working group
to study the feasibility and considerations necessary to implement a
system (1) for health care providers with an electronic health records
system capable of connecting to and participating in the State-wide
Health Information Exchange, as specified in section 17b-59e of the
general statutes, to report to said exchange incidences of patient
violence directed at a health care provider, and (2) that alerts a health
care provider with such electronic health records system when the
provider accepts a new patient or has a scheduled visit with an existing
patient who has a documented history of any such incidence.
Public Act No. 26-12 8 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)
Three members appointed by each chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, and (2) two members appointed by each
ranking member of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public health. The
chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to public health shall select the
chairpersons of the task force from among the members of the task force.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on the findings of the study, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health.
Sec. 4. Section 31-51r of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Employer" means any person engaged in business, [who has
twenty-six or more employees,] including the state and any political
subdivision thereof.
(2) "Employee" means any person engaged in service to an employer
in the business of [his] such person's employer.
(3) "Employment promissory note" means any instrument or
agreement executed on or after October 1, [1985] 2026, which requires
an employee to pay the employer, or [his] such employer's agent or
assignee, a sum of money if the employee leaves such employment
before the passage of a stated period of time. "Employment promissory
note" includes any such instrument or agreement which states such
payment of moneys constitutes reimbursement for training previously
Public Act No. 26-12 9 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
provided to the employee.
(b) On or after October 1, [1985] 2026, no employer may require, as a
condition of employment, any employee or prospective employee to
execute an employment promissory note. The execution of an
employment promissory note as a condition of employment is against
public policy and any such note shall be void. If any such note is part of
an employment agreement, the invalidity of such note shall not affect
the other provisions of such agreement.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit or render void any
agreement between an employer and an employee (1) requiring the
employee to repay to the employer any sums advanced to such
employee, (2) requiring the employee to pay the employer for any
property it has sold or leased to such employee, (3) requiring
educational personnel to comply with any terms or conditions of
sabbatical leaves granted by their employers, or (4) entered into as part
of a program agreed to by the employer and its employees' collective
bargaining representative.
Sec. 5. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force to
study additional services, funding and benefits that may be utilized in
order to support persons with disabilities who earn less than the
minimum wage pursuant to Section 14(c) of the Fair Labor Standards
Act of 1937, 29 USC 214(c). The task force shall (1) examine potential
benefits and existing impediments to the state in utilizing such
additional services for such persons, and (2) make recommendations on
funding sources and benefits the state can provide to support such
persons.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
Public Act No. 26-12 10 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
relating to labor and public employees, or their designees;
(2) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to human services, or their designees;
(3) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who has expertise in the employment of persons with disabilities;
(4) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, who is
a member of an organization that advocates for persons with
disabilities;
(5) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(7) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(8) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(9) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(10) The Labor Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
(11) The Commissioner of Developmental Services, or the
commissioner's designee; and
(12) The Commissioner of Administrative Services, or the
commissioner's designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (3),
(4), (5), (6), (7) or (8) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
Public Act No. 26-12 11 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(d) At least two members of the task force appointed under
subdivision (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) or (8) of subsection (b) of this section shall
be a parent of a person with disabilities who earns less than the
minimum wage pursuant to Section 14(c) of the Fair Labor Standards
Act of 1938, 29 USC 214(c).
(e) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(f) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
employees, or their designees, shall be the chairpersons of the task force.
Such chairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of the task force,
which shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective date of
this section.
(g) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and
public employees shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(h) Not later than January 1, 2028, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor
and public employees and human services, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes. The task force shall
terminate on the date that it submits such report or January 1, 2028,
whichever is later.
Sec. 6. Section 21a-421d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Bona fide labor organization" means (A) with respect to a labor
Public Act No. 26-12 12 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
peace agreement entered into on or before September 30, 2023, a labor
union that (i) represents employees in this state with regard to wages,
hours and working conditions, (ii) whose officers have been elected by
a secret ballot or otherwise in a manner consistent with federal law, (iii)
is free of domination or interference by any employer and has received
no improper assistance or support from any employer, and (iv) is
actively seeking to represent cannabis workers in the state, and (B) with
respect to a labor peace agreement entered into on or after October 1,
2023, a labor union that is included on the list established and
periodically updated by the department pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section;
(2) "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a cannabis
establishment and a bona fide labor organization under this section
pursuant to which the owners and management of the cannabis
establishment agree not to lock out employees and that prohibits the
bona fide labor organization from engaging in picketing, work
stoppages or boycotts against the cannabis establishment;
(3) "Cannabis establishment", "dispensary facility" and "producer"
have the same meanings as provided in section 21a-420; and
(4) "Licensee" means a cannabis establishment licensee, dispensary
facility or producer.
(b) (1) Not later than October 1, 2023, the department shall establish
and periodically update a list of labor unions that (A) are actively
seeking to represent cannabis workers in this state, and (B) satisfy the
criteria established in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) Not later than September 1, 2023, the department shall accept
applications for inclusion on the list established pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection. Any labor union that wishes to be included on
such list shall submit an application to the department, in a form and
Public Act No. 26-12 13 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
manner prescribed by the department. As part of such application, such
labor union shall attest, under penalty of false statement, that such labor
union:
(A) Is actively seeking to represent cannabis workers in this state;
(B) Satisfies at least two of the following criteria:
(i) Such labor union represents employees in this state with regard to
wages, hours and working conditions;
(ii) Such labor union has been recognized or certified as the
bargaining representative for cannabis employees employed at cannabis
establishments in this state;
(iii) Such labor union has executed one or more collective bargaining
agreements with cannabis establishment employers in this state, which
agreement or agreements remain effective on the date of such labor
union's application under this subsection; or
(iv) Such labor union has spent resources as part of one or more
attempts to organize and represent cannabis workers employed at
cannabis establishments in the state, which attempt or attempts remain
active on the date of such labor union's application under this
subsection;
(C) Has filed the annual report required by 29 USC 431(b) for the
three years immediately preceding the date of such labor union's
application under this subsection;
(D) Has audited financial reports covering the three years
immediately preceding the date of such labor union's application under
this subsection;
(E) Was governed by a written constitution or bylaws for the three
years immediately preceding the date of such labor union's application
Public Act No. 26-12 14 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
under this subsection;
(F) Is affiliated with regional or national associations of unions,
including, but not limited to, central labor councils;
(G) Is overseen by officers elected by secret ballot or otherwise in a
manner consistent with federal law;
(H) Is free from domination or interference by any employer; and
(I) Has not received any improper assistance or support from any
employer.
(3) In the event of any change in the information that a labor union
submits to the department under this subsection, the labor union shall
correct or update such information, in a form and manner prescribed by
the department, not later than thirty days after the date of such change.
(4) In the event that a labor union no longer satisfies the criteria
established in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the labor union shall
notify the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and not later than thirty days after such labor union no
longer satisfies such criteria, that such labor union no longer satisfies
such criteria. The department shall remove such labor union from the
list prepared pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c) Any provisional cannabis establishment licensee, dispensary
facility or producer shall, as a condition of its final license approval,
license conversion or approval for expanded authorization,
respectively, enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor
organization. Any such labor peace agreement shall contain a clause
that the parties agree that final and binding arbitration by a neutral
arbitrator will be the exclusive remedy for any violation of such
agreement.
Public Act No. 26-12 15 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 54, if an arbitrator
finds that a licensee failed to comply with an order issued by the
arbitrator to correct a failure to abide by such agreement, upon receipt
of a written copy of such finding, the department shall suspend the
licensee's license without further administrative proceedings or formal
hearing.
(e) A licensee or bona fide labor organization may commence a civil
action in the Superior Court in the judicial district where the facility
used in the operation of a cannabis establishment is located to enforce
the arbitration award or to lift the license suspension. The license shall
remain suspended until such time that: (1) The arbitrator notifies, or
both of the parties to the arbitration notify, the department that the
licensee is in compliance with the arbitration award; (2) both of the
parties to the arbitration notify the department that they have
satisfactorily resolved their dispute; (3) the court, after hearing, lifts the
suspension; or (4) the court, after hearing, orders alternative remedies,
which may include, but need not be limited to, ordering the department
to revoke the license or ordering the appointment of a receiver to
properly dispose of any cannabis inventory. Except as provided in
subsection (f) of this section, during such time that a license is
suspended pursuant to this section, the licensee may engage in conduct
necessary to maintain and secure the cannabis inventory, but may not
sell, transport or transfer cannabis to another cannabis establishment,
consumer or laboratory, unless such sale or transfer is associated with a
voluntary surrender of license and a cannabis disposition plan
approved by the commissioner.
(f) A producer, cultivator or micro-cultivator may sell, transport or
transfer cannabis to a product packager, food or beverage manufacturer,
product manufacturer, dispensary facility or hybrid retailer for the sale
of products to qualified patients or caregivers, which products shall be
labeled "For Medical Use Only".
Public Act No. 26-12 16 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(g) The Labor Commissioner shall not recognize, as part of the
minimum fair wage, gratuities for persons employed at a cannabis
establishment, dispensary facility or producer. Any cannabis
establishment, dispensary facility or producer who pays or agrees to
pay an employee less than the minimum fair wage shall be in violation
of section 31-60. For purposes of this subsection, "minimum fair wage"
has the same meaning as provided in section 31-58, as amended by this
act.
Sec. 7. Subdivision (1) of section 31-275 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(1) "Arising out of and in the course of his employment" means an
accidental injury happening to an employee or an occupational disease
of an employee originating while the employee has been engaged in the
line of the employee's duty in the business or affairs of the employer
upon the employer's premises, or while engaged elsewhere upon the
employer's business or affairs by the direction, express or implied, of the
employer, provided:
(A) (i) For a police officer or firefighter, "in the course of his
employment" encompasses such individual's departure from such
individual's place of abode to duty, such individual's duty, and the
return to such individual's place of abode after duty;
(ii) For an employee of the Department of Correction, (I) when
responding to a direct order to appear at such employee's assignment
under circumstances in which nonessential employees are excused from
working, or (II) following two or more mandatory overtime work shifts
on consecutive days, "in the course of his employment" encompasses
such individual's departure from such individual's place of abode
directly to duty, such individual's duty, and the return directly to such
individual's place of abode after duty;
Public Act No. 26-12 17 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(iii) For a telecommunicator, as defined in section 28-30, (I) when a
telecommunicator is subject to emergency calls while off duty by the
terms of such telecommunicator's employment, (II) when responding to
a direct order to appear at such telecommunicator's work assignment
under circumstances in which nonessential employees are excused from
working, or (III) following two or more mandatory overtime work shifts
on consecutive days, "in the course of his employment" encompasses
such individual's departure from such individual's place of abode
directly to duty, such individual's duty, and the return directly to such
individual's place of abode after duty;
(iv) For an employee of a public works department, (I) when such
employee is subject to emergency calls while off duty by the terms of
such employee's employment, (II) when responding to a direct order to
appear at such employee's work assignment under circumstances in
which nonessential employees are excused from working, or (III)
following two or more mandatory overtime work shifts on consecutive
days, "in the course of his employment" encompasses such individual's
departure from such individual's place of abode directly to duty, such
individual's duty, and the return directly to such individual's place of
abode after duty. For purposes of this subparagraph, "public works
department" means a state or municipal department responsible for the
construction, regulation or maintenance of all things in the nature of
public works and improvements;
[(iv)] (v) Notwithstanding the provisions of clauses (i) and (ii) of this
subparagraph, the dependents of any deceased employee of the
Department of Correction who was injured in the course of his
employment, as defined in this subparagraph, on or after July 1, 2000,
and who died not later than July 15, 2000, shall be paid compensation
on account of the death, in accordance with the provisions of section 31-
306, retroactively to the date of the employee's death. The cost of the
payment shall be paid by the employer or its insurance carrier which
Public Act No. 26-12 18 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
shall be reimbursed for such cost from the Second Injury Fund as
provided in section 31-354 upon presentation of any vouchers and
information that the Treasurer may require;
(B) A personal injury shall not be deemed to arise out of the
employment unless causally traceable to the employment other than
through weakened resistance or lowered vitality;
(C) In the case of an accidental injury, a disability or a death due to
the use of alcohol or narcotic drugs shall not be construed to be a
compensable injury;
(D) For aggravation of a preexisting disease, compensation shall be
allowed only for that proportion of the disability or death due to the
aggravation of the preexisting disease as may be reasonably attributed
to the injury upon which the claim is based;
(E) A personal injury shall not be deemed to arise out of the
employment if the injury is sustained: (i) At the employee's place of
abode, and (ii) while the employee is engaged in a preliminary act or
acts in preparation for work unless such act or acts are undertaken at
the express direction or request of the employer;
(F) For purposes of subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, "narcotic
drugs" means all controlled substances, as designated by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 21a-243, but does not include drugs prescribed in the course of
medical treatment or in a program of research operated under the
direction of a physician or pharmacologist. For purposes of
subparagraph (E) of this subdivision, "place of abode" includes the
inside of the residential structure, the garage, the common hallways,
stairways, driveways, walkways and the yard;
(G) The Workers' Compensation Commission shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
Public Act No. 26-12 19 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
implement the provisions of this section and shall define the terms "a
preliminary act", "acts in preparation for work", "departure from place
of abode directly to duty" and "return directly to place of abode after
duty" on or before January 1, 2006.
Sec. 8. Subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of section 10-151 of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) The contract of employment of a teacher who has not attained
tenure may be terminated at any time for any of the reasons enumerated
in subdivisions (1) to (6), inclusive, of subsection (d) of this section;
otherwise the contract of such teacher shall be continued into the next
school year unless such teacher receives written notice by May first in
one school year that such contract will not be renewed for the following
year. Upon the teacher's written request, not later than three calendar
days after such teacher receives such notice of nonrenewal or
termination, a notice of nonrenewal or termination shall be
supplemented not later than four calendar days after receipt of the
request by a statement of the reason or reasons for such nonrenewal or
termination. Such teacher, upon written request filed with the board of
education not later than ten calendar days after the receipt of notice of
termination, or nonrenewal shall be entitled to a hearing, except as
provided in this subsection, (1) before the board, or (2) if indicated in
such request and if designated by the board, before an impartial hearing
officer chosen by the teacher and the superintendent in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (d) of this section. Such hearing shall
commence not later than fifteen calendar days after receipt of such
request unless the parties mutually agree to an extension not to exceed
fifteen calendar days. The impartial hearing officer or a subcommittee
of the board of education, if the board of education designates a
subcommittee of three or more board members to conduct hearings,
shall submit written findings and recommendations to the board for
Public Act No. 26-12 20 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
final disposition. The teacher shall have the right to appear with counsel
of the teacher's choice at the hearing. A teacher who has not attained
tenure shall not be entitled to a hearing concerning nonrenewal if the
reason for such nonrenewal is either elimination of position or loss of
position to another teacher. The board of education shall rescind a
nonrenewal decision only if the board finds such decision to be arbitrary
and capricious. Any such teacher whose contract is terminated for the
reasons enumerated in subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection (d) of this
section shall have the right to appeal in accordance with the provisions
of subsection (e) of this section.
(d) The contract of employment of a teacher who has attained tenure
shall be continued from school year to school year, except that it may be
terminated at any time for one or more of the following reasons: (1)
Inefficiency, incompetence or ineffectiveness, provided, if a teacher is
notified on or after July 1, 2014, that termination is under consideration
due to incompetence or ineffectiveness, the determination of
incompetence or ineffectiveness is based on evaluation of the teacher
using teacher evaluation guidelines established pursuant to section 10-
151b; (2) insubordination against reasonable rules of the board of
education; (3) moral misconduct; (4) disability, as shown by competent
medical evidence; (5) elimination of the position to which the teacher
was appointed or loss of a position to another teacher, if no other
position exists to which such teacher may be appointed if qualified,
provided such teacher, if qualified, shall be appointed to a position held
by a teacher who has not attained tenure, and provided further that
determination of the individual contract or contracts of employment to
be terminated shall be made in accordance with either (A) a provision
for a layoff procedure agreed upon by the board of education and the
exclusive employees' representative organization, or (B) in the absence
of such agreement, a written policy of the board of education; or (6)
other due and sufficient [cause] reasons. The standard of review for all
such reasons shall be the same standard applied in other disciplinary
Public Act No. 26-12 21 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
actions under the terms of such teacher's collective bargaining
agreement. Nothing in this section or in any other section of the general
statutes or of any special act shall preclude a board of education from
making an agreement with an exclusive bargaining representative
which contains a recall provision. Prior to terminating a contract, the
superintendent shall give the teacher concerned a written notice that
termination of such teacher's contract is under consideration and give
such teacher a statement of the reasons for such consideration of
termination. Not later than ten calendar days after receipt of written
notice by the superintendent that contract termination is under
consideration, such teacher may file with the local or regional board of
education a written request for a hearing. [A board of education may
designate a subcommittee of three or more board members to conduct
hearings and submit written findings and recommendations to the
board for final disposition in the case of teachers whose contracts are
terminated.] Such hearing shall commence not later than fifteen
calendar days after receipt of such request, unless the parties mutually
agree to an extension [,] not to exceed fifteen calendar days, [(A) before
the board of education or a subcommittee of the board, or (B) if indicated
in such request or if designated by the board] before an impartial
hearing officer chosen by the teacher and the superintendent. If the
parties are unable to agree upon the choice of a hearing officer not later
than five calendar days after the decision to use a hearing officer, the
hearing officer shall be selected with the assistance of the American
Arbitration Association using its expedited selection process and in
accordance with its rules for selection of a neutral arbitrator in grievance
arbitration. [If the hearing officer is not selected with the assistance of
such association after five days, the hearing shall be held before the
board of education or a subcommittee of the board.] When the reason
for termination is incompetence or ineffectiveness, the hearing shall [(i)]
(A) address the question of whether the performance evaluation ratings
of the teacher were determined in good faith in accordance with the
program adopted by the local or regional board of education pursuant
Public Act No. 26-12 22 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
to section 10-151b and were reasonable in light of the evidence
presented, and [(ii)] (B) be limited to twelve total hours of evidence and
testimony, with each side allowed not more than six hours to present
evidence and testimony except the [board, subcommittee of the board
or] impartial hearing officer may extend the time period for evidence
and testimony at the hearing when good cause is shown. Not later than
forty-five calendar days after receipt of the request for a hearing, the
[subcommittee of the board or] hearing officer, unless the parties
mutually agree to an extension not to exceed fifteen calendar days, shall
[submit written findings and a recommendation to the board of
education as to the disposition of the charges against the teacher and
shall send a copy of such findings and recommendation to the teacher.
The board of education shall give the teacher concerned its written
decision not later than fifteen calendar days after receipt of the written
recommendation of the subcommittee or hearing officer] render to the
board of education and the teacher a written disposition that shall be
binding on the parties. Each party shall share equally the fee of the
hearing officer and all other costs incidental to the hearing. [If the
hearing is before the board of education, the board shall render its
decision not later than fifteen calendar days after the close of such
hearing and shall send a copy of its decision to the teacher.] The hearing
shall be public if the teacher so requests. [or the board, subcommittee or
hearing officer so designates.] The teacher concerned shall have the right
to appear with counsel at the hearing, whether public or private. [A
copy of a transcript of the proceedings of the hearing shall be furnished
by the board of education, upon written request by the teacher within
fifteen days after the board's decision, provided the teacher shall assume
the cost of any such copy.] Either party shall have the right to request a
copy of the transcript and shall bear the cost of any such copy. Nothing
[herein] contained in this section shall deprive a board of education or
superintendent of the power to suspend a teacher from duty
immediately when serious misconduct is charged without prejudice to
the rights of the teacher as otherwise provided in this section.
Public Act No. 26-12 23 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(e) (1) Any teacher or board of education aggrieved by the [decision
of a board of education] award of the hearing officer after a hearing as
provided in subsection (d) of this section may [appeal therefrom, not
later than thirty calendar days after such decision, to the Superior Court.
Such appeal shall be made returnable to said court in the same manner
as is prescribed for civil actions brought to said court] make an
application to the Superior Court to confirm, vacate or modify such
award pursuant to sections 52-417 to 52-419, inclusive. Any such
[appeal] application shall be a privileged case to be heard by the court
as soon after the return day as is practicable. The teacher or board of
education shall file with the court a copy of the complete transcript of
the proceedings of the hearing, [and the minutes of board of education
meetings relating to such termination, including the vote of the board
on the termination,] together with such other documents, or certified
copies thereof, as shall constitute the record of the case.
(2) Any teacher, who has not attained tenure, aggrieved by the
decision of a board of education after a hearing as provided in
subsection (c) of this section may appeal therefrom, not later than thirty
calendar days after such decision, to the Superior Court. Such appeal
shall be made returnable to said court in the same manner as is
prescribed for civil actions brought to said court. Any such appeal shall
be a privileged case to be heard by the court as soon after the return day
as is practicable. The board of education shall file with the court a copy
of the complete transcript of the proceedings of the hearing, and the
minutes of the board of education relating to such termination,
including the vote of the board on the termination, together with such
other documents, or certified copies thereof, as shall constitute the
record of the case. The court, upon such appeal, shall review the
proceedings of such hearing. The court, upon such appeal and hearing
thereon, may affirm or reverse the decision appealed from in accordance
with subsection (j) of section 4-183. Costs shall not be allowed against
the board of education unless it appears to the court that it acted with
Public Act No. 26-12 24 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
gross negligence or in bad faith or with malice in making the decision
appealed from.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Awarding authority" means any person, including a contractor
or subcontractor, that (A) awards or otherwise enters into a contract or
subcontract to perform services at a covered location, or (B) contracts to
sell or transfer control of a property where employees were employed
at any time during the ninety-day period preceding such sale or transfer.
"Awarding authority" does not include the federal government, the state
or the Connecticut Airport Authority.
(2) "Contractor" means any person that enters into a service contract
with the awarding authority and any subcontractors to such service
contract at any tier who employs two or more persons.
(3) "Covered location" includes the following locations: (A)
Multifamily residential building or complex with fifty or more units, (B)
a commercial center or complex or office building occupying more than
seventy-five thousand square feet, (C) municipal office building or
facility, (D) public or nonpublic school, (E) cultural center or complex,
including a museum, convention center, arena or performance hall, (F)
shopping mall or bank branch, (G) industrial site, (H) pharmaceutical
lab, (I) airport, (J) train station, (K) warehouse, distribution center or
other facility in which the primary purpose is the storage or distribution
of general merchandise, refrigerated goods or other products, and (L)
independent institution of higher education.
(4) (A) "Employee" means a person that works not less than sixteen
hours per week and has been engaged to perform any of the following
services at a covered location for not less than sixty days:
(i) Care or maintenance services at a covered location, including
services performed by a security guard, front-desk worker, janitor,
Public Act No. 26-12 25 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
housekeeper, maintenance employee, concierge, door attendant,
building superintendent, grounds maintenance worker, stationary
fireman, elevator operator or window cleaner; and
(ii) Passenger-related security services, cargo and ramp services, in-
terminal passenger and baggage handling and cleaning services at an
airport.
(B) "Employee" does not include a (i) managerial, supervisory or
confidential employee, including any person who would be so defined
under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, or (ii) person engaged to
perform services related to a project that requires a permit issued by a
municipality, including a building, mechanical, plumbing, structural or
electrical project.
(5) "Employer" means any person that employs two or more
employees. "Employer" includes any municipal or local government,
but does not include the federal government, the state or the
Connecticut Airport Authority.
(6) "Person" means any individual, proprietorship, partnership, joint
venture, corporation, limited liability company, trust association or
other entity that may employ or enter into other contracts, but does not
include the federal government or the state.
(7) "Successor employer" means (A) an employer that has (i) been
awarded a successor service contract, or (ii) purchased or acquired
control of a property where employees were employed at any time
during the ninety-day period preceding the sale or transfer of such
property, or (B) an awarding authority that has hired employees to
perform services substantially the same as services previously provided
under a terminated or nonrenewed service contract.
(8) "Successor service contract" means a service contract with the
awarding authority under which substantially the same services to be
Public Act No. 26-12 26 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
performed have previously been rendered to the awarding authority as
part of the same program or at the same facility under another service
contract or have previously been rendered by the awarding authority's
own employees.
(9) "Terminated contractor" means a contractor whose service
contract expires without renewal or whose contract is terminated, and
includes the awarding authority itself when (A) work previously
rendered by the awarding authority's own employees is the subject of a
successor service contract, or (B) the awarding authority sells or
transfers a property where employees were employed at any time
during the ninety-day period preceding the sale or transfer of such
property.
(b) (1) (A) Not later than fifteen days prior to (i) the termination or
nonrenewal of any service contract, (ii) the start of a successor service
contract for services previously performed by the awarding authority's
own employees, or (iii) the sale or transfer of any property where
employees were employed at any time during the ninety-day period
preceding such sale or transfer of such property, the awarding authority
shall, where applicable, give advance notice to a terminated contractor,
the employees of such terminated contractor and the exclusive
bargaining representative of any of the terminated contractor's
employees, of the termination or nonrenewal of such service contract,
successor service contract for such services or the sale or transfer of such
property. Such notice shall be provided in writing to each affected
employee and be posted in a conspicuous place at the worksite. The
awarding authority shall provide the terminated contractor, employees
of such terminated contractor and the exclusive bargaining
representative of any of the terminated contractor's employees with the
name, telephone number and address of the successor employer or
employers, if known.
(B) The terminated contractor shall, not later than three days after
Public Act No. 26-12 27 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
receipt of such notice, provide the successor employer with the name,
date of hire and employment occupation classification of each employee
employed by the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the
service contract or contract to sell or transfer property as of the date the
terminated contractor receives such notice.
(2) On the date (A) the service contract terminates, (B) the successor
service contract for services previously performed by the awarding
authority's own employees begins, or (C) the sale or transfer of property
occurs, the terminated contractor shall provide the successor employer
with updated information concerning the name, date of hire and
employment occupation classification of each employee employed by
the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the service
contract or the contract to sell or transfer property, to ensure that such
information is current up to the actual date of (i) service contract
termination, (ii) successor service contract start, or (iii) the sale or
transfer of property.
(3) If the awarding authority fails to notify the terminated contractor
of the identity of the successor employer, as required by subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the terminated contractor shall provide the
information described in subdivision (2) of this subsection to the
awarding authority not later than three days after receiving notice from
the awarding authority pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
The awarding authority shall be responsible for providing such
information to the successor employer as soon as the successor
employer has been selected.
(4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of this
subdivision, a successor employer shall retain, for at least ninety days
from the date of first performance of services (i) under the successor
service contract, or (ii) following the date of the sale or transfer of a
property, all of the employees who were continuously employed by the
terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the service contract
Public Act No. 26-12 28 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
or the contract to sell or transfer property during the ninety-day period
immediately preceding the termination or nonrenewal of such service
contract, start of the successor service contract or sale or transfer of such
property, including any periods of layoff or leave with recall rights.
(B) Except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of this
subdivision, if the successor service contract is terminated prior to the
expiration of such ninety-day period, then any successor employer
awarded a subsequent successor service contract shall be bound by the
requirements set forth in this subsection to retain, for a new ninety-day
period commencing with the onset of the subsequent successor service
contract, all of the employees who were previously employed by any
one or more of the terminated contractors at the site or sites covered by
the service contract or contract to sell or transfer property continuously
during the ninety-day period immediately preceding the date of the
most recently terminated service contract, including any periods of
layoff or leave with recall rights.
(C) At least five days prior to the termination of a service contract, or
at least fifteen days prior to the commencement of the first performance
of service (i) under a successor service contract, or (ii) following the date
of the sale or transfer of a property, whichever is later, the successor
employer shall hand-deliver a written offer of employment in
substantially the form set forth below to each such employee in such
employee's native language or any other language in which such
employee is fluent:
"IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING YOUR
EMPLOYMENT
To: .... (Name of employee)
We have received information that you are employed by .... (name of
terminated contractor) and are currently performing work at ....
Public Act No. 26-12 29 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(address of worksite) .... (name of terminated contractor's) contract to
perform .... (describe services under contract) at .... (address of worksite)
will terminate as of .... (last day of predecessor contract or date of the
sale or transfer of property) and it will no longer be providing those
services as of that date.
We are .... (name of successor employer) and have been hired to
provide services similar to those of or have purchased or acquired the
property of .... (name of terminated contractor) at .... (address of
worksite). We are offering you a job with us for a ninety-day transition
period starting .... (first day of successor contract or date of the start of
services following the sale or transfer of property) to perform the same
type of work that you have already been doing for .... (name of
terminated contractor) under the following terms:
Payrate (per hour): $....
Hours per shift: ....
Total hours per week: ....
Benefits: ....
You must respond to this offer within the next ten days. If you want
to continue working at .... (address of worksite) you must let us know
by .... (no later than ten days after the date of this letter). If we do not
receive your response by the end of business that day, we will not hire
you and you will lose your job. We can be reached at .... (successor
employer telephone number).
Connecticut state law gives you the following rights:
1. You have the right with certain exceptions, to be hired by our
company for the first ninety days that we begin to provide services at ....
(address of worksite).
Public Act No. 26-12 30 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
2. During this ninety-day period, you cannot be fired without just
cause.
3. If you believe that you have been fired or laid off in violation of this
law, you have the right to sue us or file a complaint with the Labor
Commissioner and be awarded back pay, attorneys' fees and court costs.
From: .... (Name of successor employer)
.... (Address of successor employer)
.... (Telephone number of successor employer)"
Each offer of employment shall state the time within which such
employee must accept such offer but in no case shall that time be less
than ten days from the date of the offer of employment.
(D) The provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision
shall not be construed to require a successor employer to retain any
employee whose attendance and performance records, while working
under the terminated service contract, would lead a reasonably prudent
employer to terminate the employee.
(E) For the purchase or acquisition of property by a successor
employer, the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this
subdivision shall only apply when the services to be performed at the
site or sites covered by the contract to sell or transfer property are
substantially the same as services previously provided by the
terminated contractor's employees.
(5) If at any time a successor employer determines that fewer
employees are required to perform (A) the successor service contract, or
(B) services at the purchased or acquired property than were required
by the terminated contractor, the successor employer shall be required
to retain such employees by seniority within each job classification,
Public Act No. 26-12 31 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
based upon the employees' total length of service at the affected site or
sites.
(6) During such ninety-day period, the successor employer shall
maintain a preferential hiring list of employees eligible for retention
pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection, who were not initially
retained by the successor employer, from which the successor contractor
shall hire additional employees, if necessary.
(7) Except as provided under subdivision (5) of this subsection,
during such ninety-day period, the successor employer shall not
discharge without just cause an employee retained pursuant to this
section. For purposes of this subdivision, "just cause" shall be
determined solely by the performance or conduct of the particular
employee.
(8) After such ninety-day period, the successor employer shall
provide each employee retained pursuant to this section a performance
evaluation. If the performance of such employee is satisfactory during
the ninety-day period, the successor employer shall offer the employee
continued employment under the terms and conditions established by
the successor employer, or as required by law.
(c) (1) An employee, or a group of employees, displaced or
terminated in violation of this section, or such employee's collective
bargaining representative, may bring an action in the Superior Court
against the awarding authority, the terminated contractor or the
successor employer, jointly or severally, to recover damages for any
violation of the obligations imposed under this section or file a
complaint with the Labor Commissioner alleging a violation of the
provisions of this section, provided no employee, group of employees
or such employee's collective bargaining representative shall file a
complaint with the Labor Commissioner based on the same facts and
circumstances as a civil action brought pursuant to this subdivision,
Public Act No. 26-12 32 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
except where such action has been withdrawn or dismissed without
prejudice. No employee, group of employees or such employee's
collective bargaining representative shall be required to exhaust their
administrative remedies prior to bringing a civil action pursuant to this
subdivision.
(2) If the court or the commissioner finds that the awarding authority,
the terminated contractor or the successor employer has violated the
provisions of this section, the court or the commissioner may award the
employee (A) back pay, including the value of benefits, for each day
during which the violation continues, that shall be calculated at a rate of
compensation not less than the higher of (i) the average regular rate of
pay received by the employee during the last year of employment in the
same job occupation classification, or, if the employee has been
employed for less than one year, the average rate of pay for the
employee's entire employment multiplied by the average number of
hours worked per day over the last four months of employment
preceding the date of the violation, or (ii) the final regular rate of pay
received by the employee at the date of termination multiplied by the
average number of hours worked per day over the last four months, and
any such calculation shall include interest on such back pay at a rate to
be determined by the court or the commissioner, (B) reinstatement to
the employee's former position at not less than the most recent rate of
compensation received by the employee, including the value of any
benefits, (C) compensatory damages, and (D) reasonable attorney's fees
and costs.
(d) (1) A successor employer that fails to retain or discharges an
employee in violation of the provisions of this section shall pay a penalty
of not less than five hundred dollars and not more than one thousand
dollars per employee for each day the violation continues.
(2) An awarding authority or terminated contractor that violates the
notice provisions of subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive, of subsection (b) of
Public Act No. 26-12 33 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
this section shall pay a penalty of not less than fifty dollars and not more
than two hundred dollars per employee for each day the violation
continues.
(e) Any party aggrieved by the decision of the commissioner may
appeal the decision to the Superior Court in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes.
(f) The Labor Commissioner may request the Attorney General to
bring an action in the Superior Court to recover damages pursuant to
subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section on behalf of any
employee injured by a violation of this section and any injunctive or
equitable relief as the court deems appropriate.
Sec. 10. Section 3-122a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Correction officer" means an individual employed by the
Department of Correction;
[(1)] (2) "Dependent child" means a child, whether by blood or
adoption, of a first responder who (A) is under the age of twenty-two
and was dependent on the earnings of such first responder at the time
of such first responder's death, provided a child shall not be considered
dependent if such child provides more than half of such child's own
support, is married or is legally adopted by another person, or (B) is any
age and is physically or mentally incapacitated and was dependent on
the earnings of such first responder at the time of such first responder's
death.
[(2)] (3) "Emergency medical technician" has the same meaning as
provided in section 20-206jj.
Public Act No. 26-12 34 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
[(3)] (4) "Firefighter" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
313g.
[(4)] (5) "First responder" means an emergency medical technician,
firefighter, paramedic or police officer.
(6) "Investigator" means an individual employed as an investigator
by the (A) Court Support Services Division of the Judicial Department,
(B) Division of Criminal Justice, or (C) Office of the Chief Public
Defender.
[(5)] (7) "Killed in the line of duty" means the death of a first
responder while engaged in the performance of such first responder's,
correction officer's or investigator's duties, resulting from an incident,
an accident or violence that caused such death or caused injuries that
were the direct or proximate cause of such first responder's death,
including any death that is determined to be occupationally related by
a workers' compensation insurance carrier, an employer to whom a
certificate of self-insurance has been issued pursuant to section 31-248
or an administrative law judge for workers' compensation purposes
under chapter 568. "Killed in the line of duty" does not include the death
of a first responder through such first responder's own wanton or wilful
act.
[(6)] (8) "Paramedic" has the same meaning as provided in section 20-
206jj.
[(7)] (9) "Police officer" has the same meaning as provided in section
7-294a.
[(8)] (10) "Surviving family" means any person who is a surviving
spouse, surviving dependent child, surviving child who is not a
dependent child or surviving parent of a first responder killed in the line
of duty, or a surviving individual listed on such first responder's most
recent beneficiary form on file with such first responder's employer.
Public Act No. 26-12 35 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(b) There is established a fund to be known as the "Fallen Hero Fund".
The fund may contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in
the fund and shall be held by the Treasurer separate and apart from all
other moneys, funds and accounts. The interest derived from the
investment of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Amounts in the
fund may be expended by the Comptroller for purposes of payments
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and reimbursement of
municipalities pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 3-
123eee. Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year
shall be carried forward in the fund for the fiscal year next succeeding.
(c) (1) After receiving notice, in a form and manner as determined by
the Comptroller, from an individual who is a member of the surviving
family of a first responder, correction officer or investigator who was
killed in the line of duty, the Comptroller shall pay, within available
appropriations, a lump sum death benefit totaling one hundred
thousand dollars from the fund established in subsection (b) of this
section to such surviving family, in accordance with regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, provided the
surviving family of a first responder, correction officer or investigator
killed in the line of duty shall not receive more than one such lump sum
death benefit. Payments shall be made to surviving families in the order
in which notices are received until the amount in such fund is depleted.
(2) Any payment made pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall be in addition to any other benefits for which individuals of such
first responder's, correction officer's or investigator's surviving family
are eligible and such payments shall not be reduced or offset due to any
other benefits, including, but not limited to, workers' compensation or
other survivor benefits.
(d) Not later than July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the
Comptroller shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
Public Act No. 26-12 36 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security. Such
report shall include a list of all expenditures made from the fund
established by subsection (b) of this section during the prior year, the
current balance of such fund and information regarding additional
amounts needed for such fund.
(e) The Comptroller shall adopt regulations in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 to implement the provisions of this section,
including, but not limited to, application procedures and criteria for
awarding grants among individuals who are members of the surviving
family, with priority given to awards that would benefit a dependent
child or children and a spouse who is a member of the surviving family.
The Comptroller may implement policies and procedures necessary to
implement the provisions of this section while in the process of adopting
such regulations, provided notice of intent to adopt such regulations is
published on the eRegulations System not later than twenty days after
the date of implementation of such policies and procedures. Any
policies and procedures implemented under this subsection shall be
valid until the time such regulations are adopted.
Sec. 11. Subsection (i) of section 3-123bbb of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(i) (1) A nonstate public employer that provides coverage pursuant to
a partnership plan to a first responder or unpaid volunteer firefighter
who is killed in the line of duty shall continue to provide such coverage
to the survivors of such first responder or unpaid volunteer firefighter
who were covered under such plan at the time of such first responder's
or unpaid volunteer firefighter's death. Such coverage shall continue
without break for a period of one year after such first responder's or
unpaid volunteer firefighter's death, and may be renewed annually for
up to five years. Such nonstate public employer shall facilitate
continuation and renewal of such coverage. For purposes of this
Public Act No. 26-12 37 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
subsection, "unpaid volunteer firefighter" has the same meaning as
provided in section 5-259, as amended by this act.
(2) (A) A nonstate public employer that did not provide coverage
pursuant to a partnership plan to a first responder or unpaid volunteer
firefighter who is killed in the line of duty shall apply for coverage
pursuant to a partnership plan for those survivors of such first
responder or unpaid volunteer firefighter who were receiving health
care benefit coverage through a plan offered to such first responder at
the time of such first responder's or unpaid volunteer firefighter's death,
at the request of such survivors.
(B) A nonstate public employer shall apply for such coverage
pursuant to a partnership plan (i) regardless of whether such first
responder was an employee of the nonstate public employer at the time
of such first responder's death, and (ii) despite such unpaid volunteer
firefighter not having been an employee of the nonstate public employer
at the time of such unpaid volunteer firefighter's death. For any first
responder who was not an employee of a nonstate public employer at
the time of such first responder's death, and for any unpaid volunteer
firefighter, the nonstate public employer to which the first responder or
unpaid volunteer firefighter provided services in the capacity of a first
responder or unpaid volunteer firefighter at the time of such first
responder's or unpaid volunteer firefighter's death shall apply for such
coverage.
(C) The Comptroller shall accept such application upon the terms and
conditions applicable to the partnership plan for enrollment and
provision of coverage to such survivors for one year. Such enrollment
and coverage may be renewed annually for up to five years. Such
nonstate public employer shall facilitate initiation and renewal of such
enrollment and coverage.
(3) In accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of section 3-
Public Act No. 26-12 38 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
122a, as amended by this act, and subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of
section 3-123eee, the Comptroller shall reimburse a nonstate public
employer making payments pursuant to this subsection for the total cost
of such payments from the Fallen Hero Fund established pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 3-122a, as amended by this act.
Sec. 12. Subsection (a) of section 5-259 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The Comptroller, with the approval of the Attorney General and
of the Insurance Commissioner, shall arrange and procure a group
hospitalization and medical and surgical insurance plan or plans for (1)
state employees, (2) members of the General Assembly who elect
coverage under such plan or plans, (3) participants in an alternate
retirement program who meet the service requirements of section 5-162
or subsection (a) of section 5-166, (4) anyone receiving benefits under
section 5-144 or from any state-sponsored retirement system, except the
teachers' retirement system and the municipal employees retirement
system, (5) judges of probate and Probate Court employees, (6) the
surviving spouse, and any dependent children of a state police officer, a
member of an organized local police department, a firefighter, an
unpaid volunteer firefighter, a correction officer or an investigator or a
constable who performs criminal law enforcement duties who dies
before, on or after June 26, 2003, as the result of injuries received while
acting within the scope of such officer's, [or] firefighter's, unpaid
volunteer firefighter's, correction officer's, investigator's or constable's
employment and not as the result of illness or natural causes, and whose
surviving spouse and dependent children are not otherwise eligible for
a group hospitalization and medical and surgical insurance plan.
Coverage for a dependent child pursuant to this subdivision shall
terminate no earlier than the end of the calendar year during whichever
of the following occurs first, the date on which the child: (A) Becomes
Public Act No. 26-12 39 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
covered under a group health plan through the dependent's own
employment; or (B) attains the age of twenty-six, (7) employees of the
Capital Region Development Authority established by section 32-601,
(8) the surviving spouse and dependent children of any employee of a
municipality who dies on or after October 1, 2000, as the result of
injuries received while acting within the scope of such employee's
employment and not as the result of illness or natural causes, and whose
surviving spouse and dependent children are not otherwise eligible for
a group hospitalization and medical and surgical insurance plan, [and]
(9) state marshals, and (10) the surviving spouse and any dependent
children of a state marshal who dies as the result of injuries received
while in performance of any duty for which such state marshal is
compensated by the state and not as the result of illness or natural
causes. Coverage for a dependent child pursuant to this subdivision
shall terminate no earlier than the end of the calendar year during
whichever of the following occurs first, the date on which the child: (A)
Becomes covered under a group health plan through the dependent's
own employment; or (B) attains the age of twenty-six. For purposes of
subdivision (8) of this subsection, "employee" means any regular
employee or elective officer receiving pay from a municipality,
"municipality" means any town, city, borough, school district, taxing
district, fire district, district department of health, probate district,
housing authority, regional workforce development board established
under section 31-3k, flood commission or authority established by
special act or regional council of governments. For purposes of
subdivision (6) of this subsection, "firefighter" means any person who is
regularly employed and paid by any municipality for the purpose of
performing firefighting duties for a municipality on average of not less
than thirty-five hours per week, "unpaid volunteer firefighter" means a
uniformed member of a fire department who performs firefighting
duties for the fire department but is unpaid for performing such
firefighting duties, "correction officer" has the same meaning as
provided in section 3-122a, as amended by this act, and "investigator"
Public Act No. 26-12 40 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
has the same meaning as provided in section 3-122a, as amended by this
act. The minimum benefits to be provided by such plan or plans shall be
substantially equal in value to the benefits that each such employee or
member of the General Assembly could secure in such plan or plans on
an individual basis on the preceding first day of July. The state shall pay
for each such employee and each member of the General Assembly
covered by such plan or plans the portion of the premium charged for
such member's or employee's individual coverage and seventy per cent
of the additional cost of the form of coverage and such amount shall be
credited to the total premiums owed by such employee or member of
the General Assembly for the form of such member's or employee's
coverage under such plan or plans. On and after January 1, 1989, the
state shall pay for anyone receiving benefits from any such state-
sponsored retirement system one hundred per cent of the portion of the
premium charged for such member's or employee's individual coverage
and one hundred per cent of any additional cost for the form of
coverage. The balance of any premiums payable by an individual
employee or by a member of the General Assembly for the form of
coverage shall be deducted from the payroll by the State Comptroller.
The total premiums payable shall be remitted by the Comptroller to the
insurance company or companies or nonprofit organization or
organizations providing the coverage. The amount of the state's
contribution per employee for a health maintenance organization option
shall be equal, in terms of dollars and cents, to the largest amount of the
contribution per employee paid for any other option that is available to
all eligible state employees included in the health benefits plan, but shall
not be required to exceed the amount of the health maintenance
organization premium.
Sec. 13. Section 10-153a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Members of the teaching profession shall have and shall be
Public Act No. 26-12 41 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
protected in the exercise of the right to form, join or assist, or refuse to
form, join or assist, any organization for professional or economic
improvement and to negotiate in good faith through representatives of
their own choosing with respect to salaries, hours and other conditions
of employment free from interference, restraint, coercion or
discriminatory practices by any employing board of education or
administrative agents or representatives thereof in derogation of the
rights guaranteed by this section and sections 10-153b to 10-153n,
inclusive.
(b) The organization designated as the exclusive representative of a
teachers' or administrators' unit shall have a duty of fair representation
to the members of such unit.
(c) Nothing in this section or in any other section of the general
statutes shall preclude a local or regional board of education from
making an agreement with an exclusive bargaining representative to
require as a condition of employment that all employees in a bargaining
unit pay to the exclusive bargaining representative of such employees
an annual service fee, not greater than the amount of dues uniformly
required of members of the exclusive bargaining representative
organization, which represents the costs of collective bargaining,
contract administration and grievance adjustment. [; and that such
service fee be collected by means of a payroll deduction from each
employee in the bargaining unit.]
(d) Local and regional boards of education and organizations
designated as the exclusive representative of a teachers' or
administrators' unit are authorized to negotiate provisions in a
collective bargaining agreement allowing for employees to elect to have
a payroll deduction of employee organization dues and initiation fees
and for a payroll deduction of the service fee described in subsection (c)
of this section.
Public Act No. 26-12 42 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Sec. 14. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027,
the Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection shall, in conjunction with the Department
of Mental Health and Addiction Services, expand the pilot program
known as the CRISIS initiative: Connection to Recovery through
Intervention, Support and Initiating Services state wide. At a minimum,
such state-wide expansion shall include components of the pilot
program that require training for state police officers, coordination
between state police officers and mental health professionals and
referrals to facilities for mental health services.
Sec. 15. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after October 1,
2026, any municipality not participating in the Municipal Employees'
Retirement Fund may create a deferred retirement option plan for
employees. Any plan created shall permit employees who are eligible
for service retirement to elect participation in such plan.
(b) Any deferred retirement option plan created shall include a fixed
period of time for employee participation, not to exceed five years, and
a specified rate of interest credit for employee accounts. All other
provisions of the deferred retirement option plan shall be as determined
by the municipality, provided the structure of such plan is certified by
the consulting actuary to the municipality's retirement system as having
no anticipated impact that would increase the contribution rate for such
municipality. Not later than four years after the creation of such plan,
the municipality shall obtain an evaluation of such plan from the
consulting actuary and review and assess such evaluation to determine
the cost to the fund associated with such plan. After receiving such
evaluation, the municipality may discontinue such plan.
Sec. 16. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Virtual monitoring" means remote monitoring of an individual
receiving direct care services by a third party via technology owned and
Public Act No. 26-12 43 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
operated by the individual in the individual's living quarters;
(2) "Employee organization" means any organization which exists
and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective
bargaining, or dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or
conditions of employment or other mutual aid or protection; and
(3) "Direct care services" means services provided in an agency,
facility, home or community-based setting to an individual enrolled in
a program administered by the Departments of Developmental Services
and Social Services.
(b) The Departments of Developmental Services and Social Services
may, to the extent permissible by law, provide access to any evidence
derived from virtual monitoring, and any other related evidence, used
in any proposed disciplinary action against an employee to an (1)
employee of a nonprofit organization that contracts with a state agency
to deliver direct care services, (2) employee of a contractor providing
such services, or (3) employee organization representing such
employee, provided the employee and the employee organization (A)
sign a confidentiality agreement provided or approved by the
department, (B) treat any recordings or images obtained from the virtual
monitoring technology as confidential, and (C) refrain from replicating,
reproducing or further disseminating such recordings or images
obtained from the virtual monitoring to any other person except as
necessary to represent and defend such employee in connection to such
disciplinary action or as required under law.
(c) The departments shall ensure that any grant of access to evidence
derived from virtual monitoring to an employee or employee
organization pursuant to subsection (b) of this section does not violate
the provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended from time to time, and any other
federal or state law.
Public Act No. 26-12 44 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(d) On or before July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Developmental
Services and the Commissioner of Social Services shall implement
policies and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures in
regulation form in accordance with chapter 54 of the general statutes,
provided notice of intention to adopt the regulations is published on the
departments' Internet web site and the eRegulations System not later
than twenty days after implementation. Such policies and procedures
shall be valid until the time final regulations are effective.
Sec. 17. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Self-directed home care programs" means Medicaid-funded
programs that allow a consumer to hire a personal care attendant;
(2) "Consumer" and "personal care attendant" have the same
meanings as provided in section 17b-706 of the general statutes;
(3) "Department" means the Department of Social Services; and
(4) "Fiscal intermediary" means the organization that contracts with
the department to provide payroll, taxes and administrative services for
self-directed home care programs.
(b) Except for public records exempted from disclosure under section
1-210 of the general statutes, commencing with information from the
quarterly period beginning on April 1, 2024, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall file quarterly reports, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
human services and labor. Such reports shall contain the following
information:
(1) The payroll processing error rate for personal care attendants and
the number of days until payment after correction;
Public Act No. 26-12 45 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(2) The average number of days it takes a fiscal intermediary to
onboard a new employee in order for such employee to utilize the
payroll system;
(3) The average response time for answering (A) phone calls,
including the volume of calls related to incidents described in
subdivisions (1) to (5), inclusive, of this subsection, or (B) electronic mail
messages from personal care attendants or consumers regarding general
customer service requests;
(4) The number of electronic visit verification tickets received by the
fiscal intermediary and the average time taken by the fiscal intermediary
to resolve an electronic verification ticket; and
(5) The average number of hours the fiscal intermediary's mobile
application was inoperable or offline.
Sec. 18. Section 29-221 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this chapter: (1) "Board" means the Examining Board for
Crane Operators established under section 29-222, as amended by this
act; (2) "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Administrative
Services; (3) "crane" means power-operated equipment that can hoist,
lower and horizontally move a suspended load and which has a
manufacturer's maximum rated hoisting or lifting capacity exceeding
two thousand pounds, including, but not limited to: (A) Articulating
cranes such as knuckle-boom cranes, (B) crawler cranes, (C) floating
cranes, (D) cranes on barges, (E) locomotive cranes, (F) mobile cranes
such as wheel-mounted, rough terrain, all-terrain, commercial truck-
mounted and boom truck cranes, (G) multipurpose machines when
configured to hoist and lower, by means of a winch or hook, and
horizontally move a suspended load, (H) industrial cranes such as
carry-deck cranes, (I) dedicated pile drivers when used in construction,
Public Act No. 26-12 46 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
demolition or excavation work, (J) service or mechanic trucks with a
hoisting device, (K) cranes on monorails, (L) tower cranes such as fixed
jib hammerhead boom, luffing boom and self-erecting, (M) pedestal
cranes, (N) portal cranes, (O) overhead and gantry cranes, (P) straddle
cranes, (Q) side boom cranes, (R) derricks, and (S) variations of such
equipment; (4) "hoisting equipment", other than cranes, means
motorized equipment (A) used in construction, demolition or
excavation work, (B) at a construction site for a project, other than a
project involving residential structures of less than four stories, the
estimated cost of which is more than one million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, and (C) which has a manufacturer's rated hoisting or
lifting capacity exceeding five tons and a manufacturer's rated
maximum reach in excess of thirty-two feet; (5) "department" means the
Department of Administrative Services; [and] (6) "apprentice" means a
person who is not licensed under this chapter, who has filed an
application for a license with the board and whose employer has
registered him or her with the board to learn crane operations or
hoisting equipment operations under the direct supervision of a
licensed operator in accordance with section 29-224c; and (7) "lessee"
means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company, association or other legal entity that rents or leases a crane or
hoisting equipment.
Sec. 19. Section 29-222 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
There shall be in the Department of Administrative Services an
Examining Board for Crane Operators consisting of [five] seven
members who shall be residents of this state. Members shall be
appointed by the Governor subject to the provisions of section 4-9a. One
member shall be an employee of the department, [one member] two
members shall be [a crane operator] crane operators having at least ten
years of experience, [one member] two members shall represent the
Public Act No. 26-12 47 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
interests of crane owners and two members shall be public members.
Members shall not be compensated for their services but shall be
reimbursed for necessary expenses in the performance of their duties. A
quorum of the board for the purpose of transacting business shall exist
only when there is present, in person, a majority of its membership. Any
member absent from (1) three consecutive meetings of the board, or (2)
fifty per cent of such meetings during any calendar year shall be deemed
to have resigned from the board.
Sec. 20. Subsection (b) of section 29-223a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (1) Engineers
under the jurisdiction of the United States, (2) engineers or operators
employed by public utilities or industrial manufacturing plants, (3) any
person operating either a bucket truck or a digger derrick designed and
used for an electrical generation, electrical transmission, electrical
distribution, electrical catenary or electrical signalization project, if such
person: (A) Holds a valid limited electrical line contractor or
journeyman's license issued pursuant to chapter 393 or any regulation
adopted pursuant to said chapter, or (B) has engaged in the installation
of electrical line work for more than one thousand hours, or (C) has
enrolled in or has graduated from a federally recognized electrical
apprenticeship program, (4) persons engaged in (A) the recreational
boating or fishing industry, except when engaged in construction-
related work, or [in] (B) agriculture, [or arboriculture,] or (5) persons
engaged in activities, or using equipment, excluded under section 29-
221a.
Sec. 21. Subsection (b) of section 29-224 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-12 48 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Engineers under the jurisdiction of the United States, (2) engineers
or operators employed by public utilities or industrial manufacturing
plants, (3) any person operating either a bucket truck or a digger derrick
designed and used for an electrical generation, electrical transmission,
electrical distribution, electrical catenary or electrical signalization
project, if such person: (A) Holds a valid limited electrical line contractor
or journeyman's license issued pursuant to chapter 393 or any
regulation adopted pursuant to said chapter, or (B) has engaged in the
installation of electrical line work for more than one thousand hours, or
(C) has enrolled in or has graduated from a federally recognized
electrical apprenticeship program, (4) persons engaged in (A) the
recreational boating or fishing industry, except when engaged in
construction-related work, or [in] (B) agriculture, [or arboriculture,] (5)
persons engaged in activities, or using equipment, excluded under
section 29-221a, or (6) persons operating equipment, except a tower
crane, that can hoist, lower and horizontally move a suspended load and
has a manufacturer's maximum rated hoisting or lifting capacity
exceeding two thousand pounds but not exceeding ten thousand
pounds who, pursuant to federal Occupational Safety and Health
Administration Standard 1926.1427, are (A) certified by an accredited
crane operator testing organization, (B) qualified by an audited
employer program, (C) qualified by the United States military, or (D)
licensed pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 22. Section 29-224b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The commissioner or any employee of the Department of
Administrative Services, while engaged in the performance of [his or
her] the commissioner's or employee's duties, may (1) enter at all
reasonable hours into and upon any premises in or on which the
commissioner or employee has reason to believe a crane or hoisting
Public Act No. 26-12 49 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
equipment is located for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
this chapter and the regulations adopted thereunder, (2) require a crane
operator or hoisting equipment operator to produce for verification
such operator's license issued under this chapter, (3) require a crane
owner to produce for verification such owner's certificate of registration
issued under this chapter, and (4) require a crane operator, hoisting
equipment operator, crane owner, hoisting equipment owner or lessee
to produce any document establishing an agreement between such
operator, owner or lessee and a person, firm, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, association or other legal entity to perform
crane or hoisting work on the premises.
Sec. 23. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
Administrative Services or an employee of the Department of
Administrative Services may issue a stop work order against a crane
owner, crane operator, hoisting equipment owner, hoisting equipment
operator, lessee or person that contracted with the owner, operator or
lessee to perform crane or hoisting work, if the commissioner or
employee determines that such owner, operator, lessee or person has
committed one or more of the following violations: (1) Demonstrating
incompetence or negligence, (2) permitting the operation of the owner's,
operator's or lessee's crane in an unsafe manner, or (3) failing to comply
with the provisions of section 29-223a of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, or 29-224 of the general statutes, as amended by
this act. For purposes of this section, the term "person" includes firms,
partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies, associations and
any other legal entities.
(b) Such stop work order: (1) (A) Shall require the cessation of the
owner's, operator's or lessee's crane, hoisting equipment or related
lifting operations at the place or premises where the violation was
determined to have occurred, and (B) shall not require the cessation of
unrelated construction activities at such place or premises unless such
Public Act No. 26-12 50 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
activities present an immediate danger to any individual or property,
(2) shall be effective when served upon the owner, operator or lessee
and the person that contracted with the owner, operator or lessee to
perform crane or hoisting work at the place or premises subject to such
stop work order by posting notice of the stop work order in a
conspicuous location at such place or premises, and (3) shall remain in
effect until the commissioner (A) determines that the owner, operator,
lessee or person has resolved the violation or violations that gave rise to
the stop work order, and (B) issues an order releasing such stop work
order.
(c) Any crane owner, crane operator, hoisting equipment owner,
hoisting equipment operator, lessee or person who has been served with
a stop work order pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may request
an administrative hearing to contest such stop work order. Such request
shall be made in writing to the commissioner not more than ten days
after such owner, operator, lessee or person was served with such stop
work order. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes.
(d) The commissioner shall notify the Examining Board for Crane
Operators established under section 29-222 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, of each stop work order issued under subsection
(a) of this section and any violation of such a stop work order.
(e) The commissioner shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to carry out the purposes
of this section.
Sec. 24. Section 29-225 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The board may suspend or revoke a crane operator's license, a
hoisting equipment operator's license or an apprentice's certificate, after
Public Act No. 26-12 51 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, upon
a finding that the holder has demonstrated incompetence or [has been
guilty of] negligence in the performance of [his or her] such holder's
work.
(b) The board may suspend or revoke a crane owner's registration,
after notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
upon a finding that the holder has failed to properly maintain [his or
her] such holder's crane or has permitted the operation of [his or her]
such holder's crane in an unsafe manner.
(c) (1) The board may impose a civil penalty of not more than [three]
five thousand dollars per violation per day on any crane or hoisting
equipment owner or operator, [who violates] lessee or person that
contracted with an owner, operator or lessee to perform crane or
hoisting work, after notice and hearing in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, upon a finding that the owner, operator or
lessee has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulations
adopted thereunder. For purposes of this section, "person" includes
firms, partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies,
associations and any other legal entities.
(2) The board may impose a civil penalty of not more than one
thousand dollars per violation per day on any crane or hoisting
equipment owner or operator or lessee, after notice and hearing in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, upon a finding that the
owner, operator or lessee has operated, or allowed the operation of, such
owner's, operator's or lessee's crane or hoisting equipment without a
valid license or certificate of registration, as applicable, issued under this
chapter.
(3) If the board, after notice and hearing in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, finds that a crane or hoisting equipment owner
or operator, lessee or person that contracted with an owner, operator or
Public Act No. 26-12 52 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
lessee to perform crane or hoisting work violated a stop work order
issued pursuant to section 23 of this act, the board shall impose a fine of
five thousand dollars per day for each day the stop work order was
violated.
(d) The board shall not renew a license or registration of any crane or
hoisting equipment owner or operator who has an unpaid civil penalty
until such time as such penalty is paid in full.
(e) The board, at any time after the issuance of a notice alleging a
violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted
thereunder, may accept, in lieu of a hearing in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, an agreement by any person charged with such
violation. Negotiations relating to any such agreement shall be
confidential and not subject to disclosure pursuant to the Freedom of
Information Act, as defined in section 1-200, but any such agreement
itself shall be a public record for purposes of said act.
(f) The Commissioner of Administrative Services may apply for the
enforcement of any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section
against any person who is not licensed as a crane or hoisting equipment
operator or who has not obtained a registration of any crane under
subsection (a) of section 29-224 to the superior court for the judicial
district of Hartford, or to any judge thereof if the same is not in session,
for an order (1) directing payment in full of any unpaid balance of such
civil penalty, or (2) temporarily and permanently restraining and
enjoining such person from performing or allowing the performance of
the work of a crane or hoisting equipment operator. The application for
such order, and for such other appropriate decree or process, shall be
brought and the proceedings thereon conducted by the Attorney
General.
Sec. 25. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than July 1, 2027, and
annually thereafter, each regional educational service center and the
Public Act No. 26-12 53 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
executive director of the Technical Education and Career System, in
consultation with the Department of Education, shall submit a report,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
concerning high school work-based learning programs provided in the
region served by each regional education service center or offered by
the Technical Education and Career System to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education and labor. Such report shall include, but need not
be limited to, (1) an inventory of work-based learning programs offered
by a local or regional board of education and the Technical Education
and Career System, (2) the number of students enrolled in such work-
based learning programs offered by a local or regional board of
education and the Technical Education and Career System, and (3) the
total cost incurred by each school district and the Technical Education
and Career System for each such work-based learning program. Such
report shall be posted on the Department of Education's Internet web
site.
Sec. 26. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than January 1, 2028, the
Commissioner of Education shall, in consultation with the Office of
Workforce Strategy, establish a two-year pilot program to provide
educator externships for certified educators in order to allow such
educators to participate in experiential learning with private sector
employers for the purpose of aligning classroom instruction with
current industry standards and workforce needs. In developing such
program, the commissioner shall (1) establish criteria for identifying and
screening employers for participation, (2) establish criteria for matching
educators with externships based on subject matter relevance, (3)
develop a curriculum that ensures incorporation of learned skills in the
educator's future lesson plans, (4) establish eligibility for stipends for
completion of an externship through such program by an educator, and
(5) establish eligibility for grants for employers that participate in such
program. The commissioner may contract with nongovernmental
Public Act No. 26-12 54 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
entities, including, but not limited to, nonprofit organizations, to carry
out the provisions of this section.
(b) For the school years commencing July 1, 2028, and July 1, 2029,
the commissioner shall prioritize placement in such externship program
established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to educators (1)
employed in a town designated as an alliance district, pursuant to
section 10-262u of the general statutes, or (2) who teach a topic related
to science, technology, engineering and mathematics, manufacturing or
health care.
Sec. 27. Section 31-3l of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The members of a board shall be appointed by the chief elected
officials of the municipalities in the region in accordance with the
provisions of an agreement entered into by such municipalities. In the
absence of an agreement the appointments shall be made by the
Governor. The membership of each board shall satisfy the requirements
for a local board as provided under the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act and include a regional workforce navigator described
in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Each regional workforce navigator shall coordinate with the
regional workforce development boards, the Governor's Workforce
Council and the Labor Department in order to connect individuals
participating in adult education programs and students enrolled in
grades nine to twelve, inclusive, in a public school with workforce
opportunities, including, but not limited to, internships,
apprenticeships, job shadowing opportunities and credentials offered in
the state. For purposes of this subsection "credential" has the same
meaning as provided in section 10a-35b.
Sec. 28. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than October 1, 2026, the
Public Act No. 26-12 55 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Chief Workforce Officer shall develop, in consultation with educational
institutions, the regional workforce development boards and the
Governor's Workforce Council, training on adult education programs in
the state, including, but not limited to, funding streams for such
programs and performance measures in order to ensure informed
collaboration.
(b) Not later than December 30, 2026, such training developed
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be provided to regional
workforce navigators described in section 31-3l of the general statutes,
as amended by this act.
Sec. 29. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to study the effectiveness and benefits of co-instruction models of
teaching utilized by public schools, including, but not limited to, co-
instruction models that allow individuals without a professional
certification under chapter 166 of the general statutes to teach
collaboratively with a certified teacher.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)
Two appointed by each chairperson of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
education, and (2) one appointed by each ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to education.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall report the
results of such study to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 30. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Labor Commissioner
shall post information on the Internet web site of the Labor Department
concerning the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, 42
Public Act No. 26-12 56 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
USC 12101. Such information shall include, but need not be limited to,
the definition of a disability under such act and how such definition
relates to reasonable accommodations in the workplace. Such
information shall be in a form available for downloading by an
employer to display at such employer's place of business in both English
and Spanish and posted on the department's Internet web site.
Sec. 31. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) An employer shall
provide written notice of an employee's right to reasonable
accommodations in the workplace for a disability pursuant to the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, 42 USC 12101, to:
(1) New employees at the commencement of employment; (2) existing
employees within one hundred twenty days of October 1, 2026; and (3)
any employee who notifies the employer of such employee's disability
within ten days of such notification.
(b) An employer may comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of
this section by displaying the poster created by the Labor Commissioner
for purposes of this section in a conspicuous place, accessible to
employees, at the employer's place of business.
(c) The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance
with chapter 54 of the general statutes, to establish additional
requirements concerning the means by which employers shall provide
such notice.
Sec. 32. Section 31-40w of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [Any employee may, at her discretion,] An employer shall provide
reasonable break times for an employee to express breast milk for such
employee's nursing child or breastfeed on site at [her] such employee's
workplace [during her meal or break period] in addition to such
employee's scheduled breaks.
Public Act No. 26-12 57 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(b) An employer shall make reasonable efforts to provide a room or
other location, in close proximity to the work area, other than a toilet
stall, where the employee can express [her] such employee's milk in
private, and provided there is no undue hardship, such room or other
location shall (1) be free from intrusion and shielded from the public
while such employee expresses breast milk, (2) include or be situated
near a refrigerator or employee-provided portable cold storage device
in which the employee can store [her] such employee's breast milk, and
(3) include access to an electrical outlet.
(c) An employer shall not discriminate against, discipline or take any
adverse employment action against any employee because such
employee has elected to exercise [her] such employee's rights under
subsection (a) of this section.
(d) As used in this section, "employer" means a person engaged in
business who has one or more employees, including the state and any
political subdivision of the state; "employee" means any person engaged
in service to an employer in the business of the employer; "reasonable
efforts" means any effort that would not impose an undue hardship on
the operation of the employer's business; and "undue hardship" means
any action that requires significant difficulty or expense when
considered in relation to factors such as the size of the business, its
financial resources and the nature and structure of its operation.
Sec. 33. Subsection (n) of section 19a-89e of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(n) (1) Each hospital shall report biannually to the Department of
Public Health, in a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner
of Public Health, whether it has been in compliance, for the previous six
months, with at least eighty per cent of the nurse staffing assignments
as required by any component outlined in the nurse staffing plan
Public Act No. 26-12 58 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
developed pursuant to subsections (d) and (e) of this section. Each
hospital shall submit such reports not later than January fifteenth for the
most recent six-month period ending on January first, and not later than
July fifteenth for the most recent six-month period ending on July first.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Public Health,
in consultation with an organization that represents hospitals in the
state, shall establish a report concerning the number of variations from
the nurse staffing plans developed pursuant to subsections (d) and (e)
of this section by hospitals in the state. Such report shall include (A) the
number of times a hospital-wide variation from such nurse staffing
plans occurred, and (B) the number of times there was a unit level
variation from such nurse staffing plans by a hospital. Such report shall
be submitted, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a to the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to public health and labor.
Sec. 34. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) For the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Public
Health shall, within available appropriations, establish and administer
a grant program for the purpose of expanding certified nursing assistant
training programs in the greater Hartford area and rural communities
in the state. Under the program, the department shall provide grants to
organizations that provide education and training to prospective
certified nursing assistants in such areas of the state. Such expansion
shall, to the extent possible, utilize federal funds provided pursuant to
the Rural Health Transformation Program established pursuant to 42
USC 1397ee(h) to aid education and training programs provided rural
communities. An organization may submit an application for a grant
under this section in a form and manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Public Health.
(b) Not later than December 31, 2028, and biennially thereafter, the
department shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
Public Act No. 26-12 59 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health on the implementation of the program. Such report shall include,
but need not be limited to, an evaluation of the program.
Sec. 35. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) Not later than January
1, 2027, and annually thereafter, in accordance with the findings of the
study described in subsection (b) of this section, the Labor
Commissioner shall update the informational web page, hosted on the
Internet web site of the Labor Department, which serves as a central
repository of information, resources and materials, including links to
external sources of such information, resources and materials, regarding
job training, career counseling, workforce development organizations,
employers who are veteran and military-friendly or who establish and
commit to meeting targets for the hiring of veterans and current and
former members of the armed forces, and other topics relevant to the
state's population of current and former members of the armed forces
who may be transitioning from military service to a professional
occupation in the civilian workforce. On and after January 1, 2027, the
commissioner shall (A) post in a conspicuous location on such
informational web page details of relevant employment assistance
programming administered by the Military Department, as described in
subsection (a) of section 36 of this act, and the annual job fair conducted
by the Military Department, as described in subsection (b) of section 36
of this act, and (B) undertake efforts to optimize the visibility of such
informational web page in Internet search engine results.
(2) On and after January 1, 2027, the Labor Commissioner, in
consultation with the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs and the
Adjutant General, shall annually solicit known and reputable providers
of the information, resources and materials described in subdivision (1)
of this subsection for items to be included on the informational web page
described in said subdivision.
Public Act No. 26-12 60 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(b) (1) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Labor Commissioner shall
study models from other states within the northeast region of the United
States that deploy technology, including, but not limited to, artificial
intelligence, as defined in section 4-68jj of the general statutes, to connect
current and former members of the armed forces with prospective
employers based on such members' military occupational specialties,
educational backgrounds and professional backgrounds. The
commissioner shall use the findings from such study to update the
informational web page described in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
this section.
(2) Not later than February 1, 2028, the Labor Commissioner shall
submit a report on the commissioner's findings and recommendations
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to veterans' and military affairs, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Veterans
Affairs shall send a periodic electronic mail newsletter, containing
relevant resources and materials included on the informational web
page described in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, to
interested recipients. The Labor Commissioner shall make available on
such informational page a form through which interested persons can
request to receive such periodic electronic mail newsletter, and shall
each month forward to the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs the
electronic mail addresses of those interested recipients who have made
such request during the preceding month.
(2) On and after January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Veterans
Affairs shall post in a conspicuous location on the Internet web site of
the Department of Veterans Affairs a link to the informational web page
described in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 36. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than January 1,
Public Act No. 26-12 61 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
2028, the Adjutant General, in consultation with the Labor
Commissioner and within existing resources, shall increase promotion
of, and periodically make improvements to, the state-based
employment assistance program developed and administered by the
Military Department for the provision of advice and information to
current and former members of the National Guard, who are
considering available educational and occupational opportunities. The
Adjutant General may (1) tailor such promotion and improvements to
better supplement any federally funded transition assistance program,
and (2) appoint such personnel as necessary to support, administer and
coordinate state transition assistance and related programs.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, the Adjutant General, in consultation
with the Labor Commissioner and the Commissioner of Veterans
Affairs, shall conduct an annual job fair for purposes of (1) promoting
employment of current and former members of the National Guard, and
(2) inviting representatives of employers in this state to attend and
provide information about prospective employment opportunities with
such employers. The Adjutant General shall publicize such job fair on
the Internet web site of the Military Department and shall include
information about such job fair in any periodic electronic mail
correspondence sent from the Military Department to interested
recipients.
Sec. 37. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than August 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Economic and Community Development shall consult
with the Labor Commissioner, the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs
and any other official, organization or entity the Commissioner of
Economic and Community Development deems appropriate for the
purpose of developing legislative recommendations for promoting
employment in the state of current and former members of the armed
forces, including members of any reserve component thereof, and of the
National Guard. In developing such legislative recommendations, the
Public Act No. 26-12 62 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Commissioner of Economic and Community Development may
examine the efficacy of various incentives, including, but not limited to,
tax credits, wage subsidies and reimbursements for training.
(b) Not later than January 15, 2027, the Commissioner of Economic
and Community Development shall submit a report containing the
legislative recommendations developed pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to labor, veterans' and military
affairs and commerce, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 38. Section 31-13a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [With] Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section,
with each wage payment each employer shall furnish to each employee,
in writing or, with the employee's explicit consent, electronically, a
record of hours worked, the gross earnings showing straight time and
overtime as separate entries, itemized deductions and net earnings,
except that the furnishing of a record of hours worked and the
separation of straight time and overtime earnings shall not apply in the
case of any employee with respect to whom the employer is specifically
exempt from the keeping of time records and the payment of overtime
under the Connecticut Minimum Wage Act or the Fair Labor Standards
Act.
(b) If the record of hours is furnished electronically pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the employer shall provide a means for
each employee to securely, privately and conveniently access and print
such record. The employer shall incorporate reasonable safeguards
regarding any information contained in the record furnished
electronically pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to protect the
confidentiality of an employee's personal information.
Public Act No. 26-12 63 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(c) (1) For purposes of this subsection, "employer" means a person
engaged in any activity, enterprise or business who employs one
hundred or more employees, including the state and any political
subdivision thereof.
(2) Each employer shall create a guide for pay codes for overtime and
the employer's most commonly used pay differentials, which may
include shift differentials, on-call pay, hazard pay, call-back pay,
holiday or weekend pay or geographical pay differentials used by the
employer in such records furnished pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section. Each such guide shall, if applicable, include not less than ten
pay codes and be posted on the employer's Internet web site in English,
Spanish and the other most common languages spoken by employees of
the employer and include contact information of the designated office
or individual who will handle employee disputes regarding calculations
of hours and pay differentials. An employer shall update such guide
each time a new pay code used for overtime or any pay differentials is
added by the employer.
(3) An employer shall (A) provide the Internet web site address to
such guide required pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection to an
employee upon hire, and (B) include the Internet web site address to
such guide on each record of hours furnished to an employee pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section. An employer may comply with the
provisions of this subdivision by providing a written copy of such guide
to an employee upon hire in English and the primary language of such
employee.
(4) An employer shall be deemed in compliance with the provisions
of this subsection if such employer uses a third-party payroll services
company that provides a guide for the pay codes that satisfies the
provision of subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require an
Public Act No. 26-12 64 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
employer to (A) establish and maintain an Internet web site if such
employer does not currently maintain an Internet web site, or (B)
establish new pay codes in order to satisfy the provisions of this section.
Sec. 39. (NEW) (Effective from passage) The State Fire Administrator
shall establish and administer a grant program for the purposes of
providing grants-in-aid to junior firefighter programs administered by
volunteer fire departments. The State Fire Administrator shall post in a
conspicuous place on the Division of Fire Services within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection's Internet web
site a description of the grant program, including, but not limited to,
eligibility criteria and the application process for the program. A
volunteer fire department shall apply for such grants for its junior
firefighter program on such forms and in such manner as determined
by the State Fire Administrator.
Sec. 40. Subsection (e) of section 31-58 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(e) "Employee" means any individual employed or permitted to work
by an employer but shall not include any individual employed in camps
or resorts which are open no more than six months of the year or in
domestic service in or about a private home, except any individual in
domestic service employment as defined in the regulations of the federal
Fair Labor Standards Act, or an individual employed in a bona fide
executive, administrative or professional capacity as defined in the
regulations of the Labor Commissioner or an individual employed by
the federal government, or any individual engaged in the activities of
an educational, charitable, religious, scientific, historical, literary or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not, in fact, exist or where the services rendered to such organizations
are on a voluntary basis, or any individual employed as a head resident
or resident assistant by a college or university, or any individual
Public Act No. 26-12 65 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
engaged in baby sitting, or an outside salesman as defined in the
regulations of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, or any individual
employed by a nonprofit theater, provided such theater does not
operate for more than seven months in any calendar year, or a member
of the armed forces of the state performing military duty, as such terms
are defined in section 27-61, or any individual who has entered into a
contract to play minor league baseball and is compensated pursuant to
the terms of a collective bargaining agreement;
Sec. 41. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than July 1, 2027,
the president of The University of Connecticut shall establish a
recruitment and retention program for The University of Connecticut
special police forces and fire department to address critical staffing
shortages and high resignation rates. As part of such program, the
president of The University of Connecticut shall develop: (1) Salary
schedules for all sworn members of the university's special police forces
and all members of the fire department, and (2) an education benefit to
reward such members' long-term commitment and acquisition of
institutional knowledge critical to higher education and hospital
environments.
(b) (1) The salary schedules described in subdivision (1) of subsection
(a) of this section shall: (A) Align the compensation rates of the sworn
members of the university's special police forces and the members of the
fire department with the compensation rates of members of comparable
municipal and state law enforcement and fire service agencies to
eliminate any pay disparities between the members of such agencies
and the sworn members of the university's special police forces and the
members of the fire department, and (B) eliminate any significant step
overlaps between ranks to ensure that supervisors do not earn less than
the personnel they supervise.
(2) The president shall provide the salary schedules developed
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to the Office of Labor
Public Act No. 26-12 66 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Relations and the collective bargaining unit representing the sworn
members of the university's special police forces and the members of the
fire department. Such salary schedules: (A) Shall be a mandatory subject
of the negotiations between the Office of Labor Relations and such
collective bargaining unit (i) relating to salary, including, but not limited
to, any wage reopener, and (ii) next occurring after the president has
provided such salary schedules to said office and the collective
bargaining unit, and (B) may be a subject of any negotiations between
the Office of Labor Relations and such collective bargaining unit
occurring after the president has provided such salary schedules to said
office and the collective bargaining unit, but before the negotiations
described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, by mutual agreement
of said office and such bargaining unit.
(c) (1) The president of The University of Connecticut shall develop
the parameters of the education benefit described in subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section. Such parameters: (A) May include, but
need not be limited to, tuition reimbursement or university fee waivers,
and (B) shall (i) include, but need not be limited to, the required years
of service for eligibility, and (ii) allow dependents of the sworn members
of the university's special police forces and the members of the fire
department to be eligible for such education benefit, under terms and
conditions established by the president.
(2) The president shall provide a written description of the
parameters of the education benefit developed pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection to The University of Connecticut Board of Trustees
for approval. Notwithstanding the provisions of any applicable
collective bargaining agreement or chapter 68 of the general statutes,
upon approval by the board, the education benefit shall be implemented
without modification.
Sec. 42. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027,
and annually thereafter, the president of The University of Connecticut
Public Act No. 26-12 67 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, on the recruitment and retention status of the
university's special police forces and fire department to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security and higher education and
employment advancement and to the Board of Trustees of The
University of Connecticut. Such report shall include, but need not be
limited to, for both the special police forces and the fire department: (1)
The total number of authorized positions compared to filled positions,
including a breakdown of any vacancies due to unfilled positions,
personnel being in academy training or field training or personnel being
on administrative, military or medical leave, (2) the total number of any
resignations, retirements and terminations that occurred during the
preceding year, including the average seniority of departing personnel,
(3) a detailed assessment of the forces' or department's ability to provide
mandated coverage at all applicable campuses and facilities, and (4) an
analysis of the financial impact of any costs incurred to train and recruit
personnel who resign within five years of being hired.
Sec. 43. Subsection (d) of section 10a-156b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) [The] Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 68, the president
of The University of Connecticut shall establish classifications for the
special police forces positions for The University of Connecticut at Storrs
and its several campuses, including The University of Connecticut
Health Center in Farmington, using objective job-related criteria,
including, but not limited to: (1) Knowledge and skill required to carry
out the duties of each position, including the skill required (A) in high-
density campus environments, (B) to provide student-focused
community outreach services, and (C) to provide specialized emergency
services within The University of Connecticut Health Center in
Public Act No. 26-12 68 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Farmington, (2) mental and physical effort required to carry out the
duties of each position, [and] (3) the level of accountability assigned to
each position, and (4) the responsibilities associated with exercising
jurisdiction at multiple campuses throughout the state. The president
shall establish and administer all necessary examinations for such
special police forces.
Sec. 44. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section and
sections 45 to 47, inclusive, of this act:
(1) "Public utility pole" means a pole, including a portion of a pole,
owned by a telephone company or an electric distribution company that
is used to support wires for (A) the distribution of electricity, (B)
telecommunications services, as defined in section 16-247a of the
general statutes, or (C) the lighting of streets or sidewalks;
(2) "Double utility poles" means a replacement public utility pole
built or installed alongside, or attached to, an existing public utility pole,
or a portion of an existing public utility pole, for the purpose of
transferring the wires from the existing utility pole to the replacement
utility pole, provided the existing public utility pole, including any
portion of such utility pole, has not been removed after the installation
of the replacement utility pole;
(3) "Utility pole custodian" means the electric distribution company
or telephone company with a duty to maintain a public utility pole;
(4) "Utility pole attachment database system" means a software
system designated by the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority for the
purpose of maintaining a database of attachments to public utility poles
in the state;
(5) "User" means any person or entity that is not the owner of a public
utility pole who maintains equipment of any sort on such pole, except
when a public utility pole is owned by more than one person or entity,
Public Act No. 26-12 69 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
the person or entity that is a partial owner of such pole and that is not
performing the removal or replacement work shall be considered a
"user" for the purposes of this section and section 45 of this act. "User"
does not include any municipality or political subdivision of the state or
an electric distribution company if such company owns the public utility
pole;
(6) "Electric distribution company" has the same meaning as
provided in section 16-1 of the general statutes;
(7) "Telephone company" has the same meaning as provided in
section 16-1 of the general statutes; and
(8) "Complex transfer" means work to transfer a public utility pole
attachment that would be reasonably likely to cause a service outage or
damage to any other such attachments, including work such as splicing
a communication attachment or relocating existing wireless
attachments. Any transfer involving mobile, fixed, and point-to-point
wireless communications and attachments owned by wireless Internet
service providers shall be deemed a complex transfer.
(b) A utility pole custodian, or the custodian's agent, shall deliver
notice of any removal and replacement work concerning such utility
pole to each user of such utility pole not more than seventy-two hours
(1) after starting any such work if such work is planned, or (2) after such
work is completed if such work was unplanned and necessary to correct
a hazardous condition on an emergency basis. Such notice shall describe
the location of the public utility pole, the nature of the work completed
or to be completed, the date upon which such work was completed or is
to be completed and the delivery date of such notice. Such notice shall
be delivered to each user of the public utility pole by electronic means
through the utility pole attachment database system.
(c) Except as provided in section 46 of this act, each user of a public
Public Act No. 26-12 70 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
utility pole that receives notice of work pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section shall transfer its equipment from the existing public utility pole
to the replacement public utility pole not later than (1) twenty days after
receiving such notice if such notice requires the transfer of equipment
from fifty or fewer public utility poles, or (2) forty-five days after
receiving such notice if such notice requires the transfer of equipment
from greater than fifty public utility poles. Upon the completion of the
work to transfer equipment pursuant to this subsection, the user shall
provide notice by electronic means through the utility pole attachment
database system to the utility pole custodian that such work has been
completed.
(d) (1) Except as provided in section 46 of this act, if a user fails to
complete the work required to transfer the user's equipment in the time
required under subsection (c) of this section, the telephone company, or
such company's agent, may complete such work on the user's behalf.
Such company, or such company's agent, may submit a bill to such user
based on the prevailing rate of wages established pursuant to section 31-
53 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, for any such work
completed on behalf of such user. Such user shall pay such bill not later
than sixty days after receipt.
(2) A user shall not be in violation of this section if (A) such user is
prevented from timely completing the transfer of such user's equipment
due solely to a municipality's failure to timely remove or transfer any
equipment owned by such municipality or a political subdivision of the
municipality, (B) a telephone company, or such company's agent, fails
to complete any work required to transfer such user's equipment
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, or (C) the user can
demonstrate good cause to the authority why such user failed to timely
complete such transfer, including, but not limited to, the presence of an
unidentified attachment to a public utility pole, a significant weather
event that precludes or delays the timely completion of required work,
Public Act No. 26-12 71 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
the existence of a declared emergency in the state, or if the transfer is a
complex transfer. Nothing in this section shall be construed to excuse
such user from completing such work within a reasonable period of
time, considering the circumstances of such work, as determined by the
authority.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a user
that fails to transfer the user's equipment to a replacement public utility
pole in compliance with subsection (c) of this section or fails to pay a bill
submitted to such user pursuant to subsection (d) of this section within
sixty days of receipt shall be in violation of this section. The Public
Utilities Regulatory Authority may impose, by order of the authority, a
civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars for each violation of
subsection (c) of this section, and in the case of a continued violation,
each day thereof shall be deemed a separate violation. The authority
shall impose any such civil penalty in accordance with the procedure
established in section 16-41 of the general statutes.
(2) The authority shall impose no penalty on a user pursuant to this
subsection if (A) the user of a public utility pole was prevented from
completing the transfer of such user's equipment due solely to a
municipality's failure to timely remove or transfer any equipment
owned by such municipality or a political subdivision of the
municipality, (B) a telephone company, or such company's agent, fails
to complete any work required to transfer such user's equipment
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, or (C) the user can
demonstrate good cause to the authority why such user failed to timely
complete such transfer, including, but not limited to, the presence of an
unidentified attachment to a public utility pole, a significant weather
event that precludes or delays the timely completion of required work,
the existence of a declared emergency in the state, or if the transfer is a
complex transfer. If the authority finds the user has demonstrated good
cause pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, the authority
Public Act No. 26-12 72 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
shall issue a written decision that articulates the basis for such finding.
(f) (1) An electric distribution company or telephone company that
removes a public utility pole, including any portion of such a utility
pole, and installs a replacement public utility pole shall complete the
transfer of any wires or equipment owned by the electric distribution
company or telephone company not later than forty-five days after such
company receives notice of work pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) An electric distribution company or telephone company that fails
to comply with subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be in violation of
this section. The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may impose, by
order of the authority, a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars
for each violation of this subsection, and in the case of a continued
violation, each day thereof shall be deemed a separate violation. The
authority shall impose any such civil penalty in accordance with the
procedure established in section 16-41 of the general statutes, except
when such company can demonstrate good cause to the authority why
such company failed to timely complete such transfer, including, but not
limited to, the presence of an unidentified attachment to a public utility
pole, a significant weather event that precludes or delays the timely
completion of required work, the existence of a declared emergency in
the state, or if the transfer is a complex transfer. If the authority finds the
company has demonstrated good cause, the authority shall issue a
written decision that articulates the basis for such finding.
(g) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority shall remit the amount
of any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section or section 45 of this
act to the Commissioner of Social Services for the purpose of providing
funding for the Connecticut energy assistance program administered by
the commissioner pursuant to section 17b-2 of the general statutes.
(h) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may adopt regulations,
Public Act No. 26-12 73 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
in accordance with chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
provisions of this section and section 45 of this act.
Sec. 45. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) On and after July 1, 2027, and
not less than every six months thereafter, each utility pole custodian
shall compile a list of any users who have failed to complete work
required to transfer the user's equipment in compliance with subsection
(c) of section 44 of this act. Each utility pole custodian shall submit such
list to the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority.
(b) On and after October 1, 2027, and not less than every six months
thereafter, based on any list submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority shall post on the
Internet web site of the authority a list of users with an aggregate
number of public utility pole attachments for which the user has not yet
completed a transfer as required pursuant to subsection (c) of section 44
of this act that is three per cent or greater of the total number of public
utility poles to which the user has an attachment in the state.
(c) Any user identified in a list compiled pursuant to subsection (b)
of this section shall provide the authority with a written explanation of
why such user has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection (c)
of section 44 of this act.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2029, each electric distribution company
and telephone company shall undertake any work required pursuant to
section 44 of this act to eliminate double utility poles in existence on
January 1, 2027. Any such company that fails to perform the work
required to eliminate such double utility poles on or before January 1,
2029, shall be in violation of this section. The Public Utilities Regulatory
Authority may impose, by order of the authority, a civil penalty not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each violation of this section, and in the
case of a continued violation, each day thereof shall be deemed a
separate violation. The authority shall impose any such civil penalty in
Public Act No. 26-12 74 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
accordance with the procedure established in section 16-41 of the
general statutes.
Sec. 46. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) A user shall be exempt from the
provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of section 44 of this act and
subsections (c) and (d) of section 45 of this act if the user is not identified
on the list published by the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority
pursuant to subsection (b) of section 45 of this act.
Sec. 47. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than December 1,
2026, the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority shall initiate a docket for
the purpose of developing a recommended damage liability clause that
shall be adopted by any public utility pole custodian in any contract or
other agreement with a user of such pole. The damage liability clause
shall address scenarios in which, in the process of transferring an
attachment or equipment from one such pole to another such pole, a
user damages an attachment or other equipment of another user of such
pole. Such damage liability clause shall establish a mechanism for
reimbursement for damage in an amount less than one hundred
thousand dollars, and the submission to the authority for resolution of
damages in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars or greater.
Sec. 48. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Labor Commissioner and the
Chief Manufacturing Officer, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Veterans Affairs, shall, within available appropriations, post
information on the Internet web sites of the Labor Department and the
Office of Manufacturing concerning benefits and services available to
veterans, as defined in section 27-103 of the general statutes, in the state.
Such information shall be in a form available for downloading by an
employer to display at such employer's place of business.
Sec. 49. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Administrative Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection and the State Fire
Public Act No. 26-12 75 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Administrator, shall establish a job classification for part-time fire
service instructors within the Division of Fire Services Administration
within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection.
Sec. 50. (Effective from passage) The Comptroller shall conduct a study
of health insurance coverage for retired police officers and firefighters
in the state. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, an
assessment of any gaps in, or lack of, health insurance coverage, or
diminished health insurance coverage for police officers and firefighters
in the state who are no longer employed as police officers or firefighters
due to normal retirement or early retirement as a result of any illness or
injury. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Comptroller shall submit a
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public employees on
the findings of such study. For purposes of this section, "police officer"
has the same meaning as provided in section 7-294a of the general
statutes and "firefighter" has the same meaning as provided in section
7-313g of the general statutes.
Sec. 51. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this section,
"reasonable assurance" means:
(1) An offer of employment to an individual for the following school
year, whether written, oral or implied, provided such offer: (A) Was
made by an employee of a local or regional board of education, regional
educational service center, governing authority for a state charter school
or an endowed or incorporated academy approved by the State Board
of Education pursuant to section 10-34 of the general statutes, who has
authority to make such offer; (B) is for services in the same capacity as
the individual provided in the prior school year; (C) provides wages or
a salary in an amount not less than ninety per cent of the amount paid
to such individual, in the aggregate, by every educational institution for
which such individual worked during the prior school year; and (D) is
Public Act No. 26-12 76 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
not contingent on factors within the control of such board of education,
regional educational service center, governing authority or endowed or
incorporated academy, including, but not limited to, course
programming, allocation of available funding, program modifications
or facility availability; and
(2) It is highly probable that such individual will provide services in
the same capacity during the following school year based on the totality
of circumstances of the case, including, but not limited to, availability of
funding, past enrollment levels, the individual's level of seniority and
the nature of the contingencies on the offer.
(b) Not later than ten days before the last day of regular school
sessions, each local or regional board of education, regional educational
service center, governing authority for a state charter school or an
endowed or incorporated academy approved by the State Board of
Education pursuant to section 10-34 of the general statutes in the state
shall submit to the Labor Department, in the form and manner
prescribed by the Labor Commissioner: (1) A list of each individual who
(A) was employed as a paraeducator for such board of education,
regional educational service center, governing authority or endowed or
incorporated academy, and (B) does not have a reasonable assurance of
providing such services in the same capacity the following school year,
including such individual's name and Social Security number, and (2) a
list of each individual who (A) was employed as a paraeducator for such
board of education, regional educational service center, governing
authority or endowed or incorporated academy, and (B) has a
reasonable assurance of providing such services in the same capacity
during the following school year or during the period following a school
holiday or school vacation, including a description of the manner in
which such reasonable assurance was provided to such individual,
including, but not limited to, whether an offer was made in writing,
orally or implied, the nature of any contingencies in the offer and the
Public Act No. 26-12 77 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
information about the offer communicated to the individual.
(c) The information required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
may be considered by the Labor Commissioner for purposes of
determining eligibility for benefits pursuant to chapter 567 of the
general statutes, provided such information shall not be conclusive
evidence of reasonable assurance in any case.
Sec. 52. Section 10-155k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
On and after July 1, 2013, the Commissioner of Education shall
establish a School Paraprofessional Advisory Council, which on and
after July 1, 2021, shall be known as the School Paraeducator Advisory
Council, consisting of (1) [one paraeducator] five paraeducators from
[each] state-wide bargaining representative [organization]
organizations that [represents] represent paraeducators with
instructional responsibilities nominated by the Connecticut AFL-CIO,
(2) one representative from each of the exclusive bargaining units for
certified employees, chosen pursuant to section 10-153b, (3) the most
recent recipient of the Connecticut Paraeducator of the Year Award, (4)
two representatives from the regional educational service centers,
appointed by the Commissioner of Education, and (5) a school
administrator, appointed by the Connecticut Federation of School
Administrators. The council shall hold quarterly meetings and advise,
at least quarterly, the Commissioner of Education, or the
commissioner's designee, of the needs for (A) professional development
and the training of paraeducators and the effectiveness of the content
and the delivery of existing training for such paraeducators, (B)
appropriate staffing strategies for paraeducators, and (C) consideration
of other relevant issues relating to paraeducators. The council shall
report, annually, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, on
the recommendations given to the commissioner, or the commissioner's
designee, pursuant to the provisions of this section, to the joint standing
Public Act No. 26-12 78 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education.
Sec. 53. Subsection (e) of section 29-4 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(e) [Salaries] (1) Except as provided in an agreement executed
pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section, salaries of the members of the
Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection shall be fixed by the Commissioner of
Administrative Services as provided in section 4-40. State police
personnel may be promoted, demoted, suspended or removed by the
commissioner, but no final dismissal from the service shall be ordered
until a hearing has been had before the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection on charges preferred against such officer.
Each state police officer shall, before entering upon such officer's duties,
be sworn to the faithful performance of such duties. The Commissioner
of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall designate an
adequate patrol force for motor patrol work exclusively.
(2) For any sworn member of the Division of State Police within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection assigned to a
highway construction project administered by the Department of
Transportation, such sworn member shall be paid at a rate established
pursuant to an agreement executed between the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection and the Commissioner of
Transportation on or after the effective date of this section.
Sec. 54. Section 31-53 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) Each contract for the construction, remodeling, refinishing,
Public Act No. 26-12 79 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
refurbishing, rehabilitation, alteration or repair of any public works
project by the state or any of its agents, or by any political subdivision
of the state or any of its agents, including, on and after July 1, 2025, each
contract for off-site custom fabrication for any such public works
project, shall contain the following provision: "The wages paid on an
hourly basis to any person performing the work of any mechanic,
laborer or worker on the work herein contracted to be done and the
amount of payment or contribution paid or payable on behalf of each
such person to any employee welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i)
of this section, shall be at a rate equal to the rate customary or prevailing
for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the town in which
such public works project is being constructed. Any contractor who is
not obligated by agreement to make payment or contribution on behalf
of such persons to any such employee welfare fund shall pay to each
mechanic, laborer or worker as part of such person's wages the amount
of payment or contribution for such person's classification on each pay
day." For purposes of this subsection, "off-site custom fabrication"
means the fabrication of mechanical systems that are fabricated at a site
located within the state other than the location of a public works project,
but are fabricated specifically for such public works project, including
plumbing systems, heating systems, cooling systems, pipefitting
systems, ventilation systems or exhaust duct systems. "Off-site custom
fabrication" does not include components or materials that are stock
shelf items or readily available.
(b) If the commissioner, upon inspection or investigation of a
complaint, believes that a contractor or subcontractor has knowingly or
wilfully employed any mechanic, laborer or worker in the construction,
remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation, alteration or repair
of any public works project for or on behalf of the state or any of its
agents, or any political subdivision of the state or any of its agents, at a
rate of wage on an hourly basis that is less than the rate customary or
prevailing for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the town
Public Act No. 26-12 80 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
in which such public works project is being constructed, remodeled,
refinished, refurbished, rehabilitated, altered or repaired, or who has
failed to pay the amount of payment or contributions paid or payable
on behalf of each such person to any employee welfare fund, or in lieu
thereof to the person, as provided by subsection (a) of this section, such
contractor or subcontractor shall be issued a citation and may be fined
five thousand dollars for each offense. The commissioner shall maintain
a list of any contractor or subcontractor that, during the three preceding
calendar years, violates this section or enters into a settlement with the
commissioner to resolve any claim brought by the commissioner
pursuant to this section. For each contractor or subcontractor placed on
such list, the commissioner shall record the following information: (1)
The nature of the violation; (2) the total amount of wages and fringe
benefits making up the violation or agreed upon in any settlement with
the commissioner; and (3) the total amount of civil penalties and fines
agreed upon by the commissioner. The commissioner shall review the
list on the first day of May each year for the preceding rolling three-year
period and may refer for debarment any contractor or subcontractor that
committed a violation of this section during the rolling three-year
period. The commissioner shall refer for debarment any contractor or
subcontractor that entered into one or more settlement agreements with
the commissioner where the sum total of all settlements within such
period exceeds fifty thousand dollars in back wages or fringe benefits,
or entered into one or more settlement agreements with the
commissioner where the sum total of all settlements within such period
exceeds fifty thousand dollars in civil penalties or fines agreed upon by
the commissioner. Any contractor or subcontractor the commissioner
refers for debarment may request a hearing before the commissioner.
Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54. In addition, if it is found by the contracting officer
representing the state or political subdivision of the state that any
mechanic, laborer or worker employed by the contractor or any
subcontractor directly on the site for the work covered by the contract
Public Act No. 26-12 81 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
has been or is being paid a rate of wages less than the rate of wages
required by the contract to be paid as required by this section, the state
or contracting political subdivision of the state may (A) by written or
electronic notice to the contractor, terminate such contractor's right to
proceed with the work or such part of the work as to which there has
been a failure to pay said required wages and to prosecute the work to
completion by contract or otherwise, and the contractor and the
contractor's sureties shall be liable to the state or the contracting political
subdivision for any excess costs occasioned the state or the contracting
political subdivision thereby, or (B) withhold payment of money to the
contractor or subcontractor. The contracting department of the state or
the political subdivision of the state shall, not later than two days after
taking such action, notify the Labor Commissioner, in writing or
electronically, of the name of the contractor or subcontractor, the project
involved, the location of the work, the violations involved, the date the
contract was terminated, and steps taken to collect the required wages.
(c) The Labor Commissioner may make complaint to the proper
prosecuting authorities for the violation of any provision of subsection
(b) of this section.
(d) For the purpose of predetermining the prevailing rate of wage on
an hourly basis and the amount of payment, contributions and member
benefits paid or payable on behalf of each person to any employee
welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, in each town
where such contract is to be performed, the Labor Commissioner shall
adopt the rate of wages on an hourly basis in accordance with the
provisions of this section and section 31-76c, and the amount, at the
journeyman rate, of payment, contributions and member benefits,
including health, pension, annuity and apprenticeship funds, as
recognized by the United States Department of Labor and the Labor
Commissioner paid or payable on behalf of each person to any
employee welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, as
Public Act No. 26-12 82 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
established in the collective bargaining agreements or understandings
between employers or employer associations and bona fide labor
organizations for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the
town in which the applicable public works project, as defined in section
31-56a, is being constructed. For each trade or occupation for which
more than one collective bargaining agreement is in effect for the town
in which such project is being constructed, the collective bargaining
agreement of historical jurisdiction shall prevail. For each trade or
occupation for which there is no collective bargaining agreement in
effect for the town in which the public works project is being
constructed, the Labor Commissioner shall adopt and use such
appropriate and applicable prevailing wage rate determinations as have
been made by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under the
provisions of the Davis-Bacon Act, as amended.
(e) The Labor Commissioner shall determine the prevailing rate of
wages on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or contributions
paid or payable on behalf of such person to any employee welfare fund,
as defined in subsection (i) of this section, in each locality where any
such public work is to be constructed, and the agent empowered to let
such contract shall contact the Labor Commissioner, at least ten but not
more than twenty days prior to the date such contracts will be
advertised for bid, to ascertain the proper rate of wages and amount of
employee welfare fund payments or contributions and shall include
such rate of wage on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or
contributions paid or payable on behalf of each person to any employee
welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, or in lieu thereof
the amount to be paid directly to each person for such payment or
contributions as provided in subsection (a) of this section for all
classifications of labor in the proposal for the contract. The rate of wage
on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or contributions to any
employee welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, or
cash in lieu thereof, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall, at
Public Act No. 26-12 83 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
all times, be considered as the minimum rate for the classification for
which it was established. Prior to the award of any contract, purchase
order, bid package or other designation subject to the provisions of this
section, such agent shall certify to the Labor Commissioner, either in
writing or electronically, the total dollar amount of work to be done in
connection with such public works project, regardless of whether such
project consists of one or more contracts. Upon the award of any
contract subject to the provisions of this section, the contractor to whom
such contract is awarded shall certify, under oath, to the Labor
Commissioner the pay scale to be used by such contractor and any of
the contractor's subcontractors for work to be performed under such
contract.
(f) Each employer subject to the provisions of this section, section 31-
53c, subsection (f) of section 31-53d or section 31-54 shall (1) keep,
maintain and preserve such records relating to the wages and hours
worked by each person performing the work of any mechanic, laborer
and worker and a schedule of the occupation or work classification at
which each person performing the work of any mechanic, laborer or
worker on the project is employed during each work day and week in
such manner and form as the Labor Commissioner establishes to assure
the proper payments due to such persons or employee welfare funds
under this section, section 31-53c, subsection (f) of section 31-53d or
section 31-54, regardless of any contractual relationship alleged to exist
between the contractor and such person, provided such employer shall
have the option of keeping, maintaining and preserving such records in
an electronic format, and (2) submit monthly to the contracting agency
or the Department of Economic and Community Development
pursuant to section 31-53c or to the developer of a covered project, as
defined in section 31-53d, as applicable, by mail, electronic mail or other
method accepted by such agency, the Department of Economic and
Community Development or such developer, a certified payroll that
shall consist of a complete copy of such records accompanied by a
Public Act No. 26-12 84 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
statement signed by the employer that indicates (A) such records are
correct; (B) the rate of wages paid to each person performing the work
of any mechanic, laborer or worker and the amount of payment or
contributions paid or payable on behalf of each such person to any
employee welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, are
not less than the prevailing rate of wages and the amount of payment or
contributions paid or payable on behalf of each such person to any
employee welfare fund, as determined by the Labor Commissioner
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and not less than those
required by the contract to be paid; (C) the employer has complied with
the applicable provisions of this section, section 31-53c, subsection (f) of
section 31-53d and section 31-54; (D) each such person is covered by a
workers' compensation insurance policy for the duration of such
person's employment, which shall be demonstrated by submitting to the
contracting agency the name of the workers' compensation insurance
carrier covering each such person, the effective and expiration dates of
each policy and each policy number; (E) the employer does not receive
kickbacks, as defined in 41 USC 52, from any employee or employee
welfare fund; and (F) pursuant to the provisions of section 53a-157a, the
employer is aware that filing a certified payroll which the employer
knows to be false is a class D felony for which the employer may be fined
up to five thousand dollars, imprisoned for up to five years, or both.
This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a general contractor
from relying on the certification of a lower tier subcontractor, provided
the general contractor shall not be exempted from the provisions of
section 53a-157a if the general contractor knowingly relies upon a
subcontractor's false certification. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 1-210, the certified payroll shall be considered a public record
and every person shall have the right to inspect and copy such records
in accordance with the provisions of section 1-212. The provisions of
subsections (a) and (b) of section 31-59 and sections 31-66 and 31-69 that
are not inconsistent with the provisions of this section, section 31-53c or
31-54 apply to this section. Failing to file a certified payroll pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-12 85 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
subdivision (2) of this subsection is a class D felony for which the
employer may be fined up to five thousand dollars, imprisoned for up
to five years, or both.
(g) Any contractor who is required by the Labor Department to make
any payment as a result of a subcontractor's failure to pay wages or
benefits, or any subcontractor who is required by the Labor Department
to make any payment as a result of a lower tier subcontractor's failure
to pay wages or benefits, may bring a civil action in the Superior Court
to recover no more than the damages sustained by reason of making
such payment, together with costs and a reasonable attorney's fee.
(h) (1) The provisions of this section shall not apply where (A) the
combined total cost or total bond authorization for all work to be
performed by all contractors and subcontractors in connection with new
construction of any public works project is less than one million dollars,
or (B) the combined total cost of all work to be performed by all
contractors and subcontractors in connection with any remodeling,
refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation, alteration or repair of any
public works project is less than one hundred thousand dollars.
(2) On and after October 31, 2017, and prior to July 1, 2019, the
provisions of this subdivision shall not apply where the work to be
performed by any contractor or subcontractor in connection with new
construction, remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation,
alteration or repair of any public works project funded in whole or in
part by any private bequest that is greater than nine million dollars but
less than twelve million dollars for a municipality in New Haven
County with a population of not less than twelve thousand and not
more than thirteen thousand, as determined by the most recent
population estimate by the Department of Public Health.
(3) On and after July 1, 2019, and prior to January 1, 2020, the
provisions of this subdivision shall not apply where the work to be
Public Act No. 26-12 86 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
performed by any contractor or subcontractor in connection with new
construction, remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation,
alteration or repair of any public works project funded in whole or in
part by any private bequest that is greater than nine million dollars but
less than twenty-two million dollars for a municipality in New Haven
County with a population of not less than twelve thousand and not
more than thirteen thousand, as determined by the most recent
population estimate by the Department of Public Health.
(i) As used in this section and sections 31-53c and 31-54, "employee
welfare fund" means any trust fund established by one or more
employers and one or more labor organizations or one or more other
third parties not affiliated with the employers to provide from moneys
in the fund, whether through the purchase of insurance or annuity
contracts or otherwise, benefits under an employee welfare plan;
provided such term shall not include any such fund where the trustee,
or all of the trustees, are subject to supervision by the Banking
Commissioner of this state or any other state or the Comptroller of the
Currency of the United States or the Board of Governors of the Federal
Reserve System, and "benefits under an employee welfare plan" means
one or more benefits or services under any plan established or
maintained for persons performing the work of any mechanics, laborers
or workers or their families or dependents, or for both, including, but
not limited to, medical, surgical or hospital care benefits; benefits in the
event of sickness, accident, disability or death; benefits in the event of
unemployment, or retirement benefits.
(j) (1) Each employer subject to the provisions of this section, section
31-53c, subsection (f) of section 31-53d or section 31-54 shall complete a
daily record of each person performing the work of any mechanic,
laborer or worker at a work site. Such daily record shall include (A) the
name and location of the project, (B) the current date, (C) the printed
name or signature and, where applicable, trade license number of each
Public Act No. 26-12 87 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
person performing the work of a mechanic, laborer or worker, and (D)
the arrival and departure time to the work site of each person
performing the work of a mechanic, laborer or worker.
(2) An employer shall (A) keep, maintain and preserve such daily
records, and (B) submit such daily records weekly to the contracting
agency or the Department of Economic and Community Development,
pursuant to section 31-53c, or to the developer of a covered project, as
defined in section 31-53d, as applicable, by mail, electronic mail or other
method accepted by such agency, the Department of Economic and
Community Development or such developer.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1-210, the daily records
required pursuant to this subsection shall be considered a public record
and every person shall have the right to inspect and copy such daily log
or sign-in sheet in accordance with the provisions of section 1-212.
(4) Failure to file the daily records required pursuant to this
subsection is a class C misdemeanor for which the employer may be
fined up to five hundred dollars, imprisoned for up to three months, or
both.
Sec. 55. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) For the purposes of this
section and section 31-72 of the general statutes, as amended by this act:
(1) "Construction contract" means any contract entered into on or
after January 1, 2027, for construction, renovation or rehabilitation in the
state, including any improvements to real property that are associated
with such construction, renovation or rehabilitation, or any subcontract
for construction, renovation or rehabilitation between an owner and a
contractor, a contractor and a subcontractor or between a subcontractor
and another subcontractor. "Construction contract" does not include (A)
any public works or other contract entered into with any agency or
department in the state, another state or a federal agency or department,
Public Act No. 26-12 88 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
or (B) a home improvement contract for (i) the construction, renovation
or rehabilitation of an owner-occupied residence or the property where
such residence is located, or (ii) the construction, renovation or
rehabilitation of a one-family or two-family dwelling unit or the
property where such dwelling unit is located, except when such contract
is for the construction of more than fifteen one-family or two-family
dwelling units at one project site;
(2) "Contractor" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, company, organization or other business
entity, including, but not limited to, a construction manager, general or
prime contractor, joint venture or any combination thereof that has a
direct contractual relationship with an owner;
(3) "Employee" has the same meaning as provided in section 31-71a
of the general statutes;
(4) "Owner" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-158i of
the general statutes;
(5) "Retainage" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-158i
of the general statutes;
(6) "Subcontractor" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, company, organization or other business entity
or any combination thereof that (A) does not have a direct contractual
relationship with an owner, and (B) (i) is a party to a construction
contract with a contractor, (ii) is a party to a construction contract with
another subcontractor that has a direct contractual relationship with a
contractor, or (iii) performs any portion of work at any tier within the
scope of a construction contract regardless of whether such
subcontractor has a direct contractual relationship with a contractor;
and
(7) "Wages" has the same meaning as provided in section 31-71a of
Public Act No. 26-12 89 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
the general statutes.
(b) A contractor that enters into a construction contract shall be jointly
and severally liable for any unpaid wages due to an employee of a
subcontractor for such employee's performance of labor included within
the scope of the construction contract.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a contractor from including
in any construction contract between such contractor and a
subcontractor a provision establishing a remedy for any liability created
by the nonpayment of wages by a subcontractor, including, but not
limited to, a provision providing that such liability can be paid from the
amount withheld for retainage under such contract, provided, for such
contracts entered into or renewed on and after January 1, 2027, such
provision does not diminish the right of an employee to bring an action
under section 31-72 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, and
does not waive or release any liability assigned to a contractor under
this section. No such provision in a contract entered into or renewed on
or after January 1, 2027, to waive or release liability assigned to the
contractor under this section shall be enforceable.
Sec. 56. Section 31-72 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
(a) When any employer fails to pay an employee wages in accordance
with the provisions of sections 31-71a to 31-71i, inclusive, or fails to
compensate an employee in accordance with section 31-76k or where an
employee or a labor organization representing an employee institutes
an action to enforce an arbitration award which requires an employer to
make an employee whole or to make payments to an employee welfare
fund, such employee or labor organization shall recover, in a civil action,
(1) twice the full amount of such wages, with costs and such reasonable
attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court, or (2) if the employer
establishes that the employer had a good faith belief that the
Public Act No. 26-12 90 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
underpayment of wages was in compliance with law, the full amount of
such wages or compensation, with costs and such reasonable attorney's
fees as may be allowed by the court. Any agreement between an
employee and his or her employer for payment of wages other than as
specified in said sections shall be no defense to such action. The Labor
Commissioner may collect the full amount of any such unpaid wages,
payments due to an employee welfare fund or such arbitration award,
as well as interest calculated in accordance with the provisions of section
31-265 from the date the wages or payment should have been received,
had payment been made in a timely manner. In addition, the Labor
Commissioner may bring any legal action necessary to recover twice the
full amount of unpaid wages, payments due to an employee welfare
fund or arbitration award, and the employer shall be required to pay the
costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court.
The commissioner shall distribute any wages, arbitration awards or
payments due to an employee welfare fund collected pursuant to this
section to the appropriate person.
(b) When a subcontractor fails to pay an employee wages for labor
performed within the scope of a construction contract entered into on or
after January 1, 2027, the employee, or a labor organization representing
the employee, may bring a civil action under this section against either
the subcontractor, the contractor or both the subcontractor and
contractor. Not less than thirty days prior to bringing a civil action
under this section, if a contractor is a party in such action, an employee
shall provide notice of an alleged violation by the subcontractor to such
contractor. Such notice shall describe the general nature of the alleged
violation. No employee shall be required to provide notice pursuant to
this subsection if such employee has previously given notice to a
contractor of either the same violation or a prior violation by the same
subcontractor. Any notice provided to a contractor pursuant to this
subsection shall not limit the liability of the contractor or preclude
subsequent amendments of an action brought under this section to
Public Act No. 26-12 91 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
encompass additional employees employed by the subcontractor. For
purposes of this section, "construction contract", "contractor" and
"subcontractor" have the same meanings as provided in section 55 of this
act.
Sec. 57. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Board of Trustees of The
University of Connecticut and the Board of Regents for Higher
Education shall jointly (1) not later than October 1, 2026, identify
qualities and best practices of an internship program that would qualify
such internship program as a high quality internship program, which
qualities shall include, but need not be limited to, not fewer than six of
the eight career readiness competencies established by the National
Association of Colleges and Employers, as determined by said boards,
and (2) not later than January 1, 2027, design a syllabus for an
asynchronous online training course for employers using the qualities
and best practices identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection that would enable such employers to offer a high quality
internship program.
(b) Each board shall post in a conspicuous location on its Internet web
site (1) the qualities and best practices identified pursuant to subdivision
(1) of subsection (a) of this section, and (2) a link to the Internet web site
by which an employer may register for the training course to offer high
quality internship programs pursuant to section 58 of this act.
Sec. 58. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) Not later than July 1, 2027,
the Board of Regents for Higher Education shall develop and offer an
asynchronous online training course for employers to offer high quality
internship programs based on the syllabus designed pursuant to
subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 57 of this act. Such course
shall be offered through Charter Oak State College and may be subject
to a course enrollment fee, as prescribed by said college. Said college
shall award a credential, as prescribed by said college, to any employer
for the successful completion of such course.
Public Act No. 26-12 92 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(b) Not later than July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the Board of
Regents for Higher Education shall report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to higher education regarding the number of employers in the
state who received a credential during the prior fiscal year for the
successful completion of the training course offered pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 59. (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027, each
institution of higher education in the state shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to higher education. Such report shall
include a description of each internship opportunity available to
students enrolled at such institution through such institution's career
services that shall include, but need not be limited to, the type of
employer that offers the internship, the quality measures the institution
utilizes to ensure that each internship provides a valuable experience to
students and any other relevant information.
Sec. 60. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Department of Administrative
Services shall conduct a survey of each state agency, except a constituent
unit of the state system of higher education, concerning the internship
programs offered by such state agency. Such survey shall include, but
need not be limited to, whether each internship that is available through
each internship program offered by each state agency (1) is paid, and (2)
meets the qualities and best practices, identified pursuant to subdivision
(1) of subsection (a) of section 57 of this act, of a high quality internship
program.
(b) Not later than February 1, 2027, the Department of Administrative
Services shall submit, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Public Act No. 26-12 93 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher education
and employment advancement a report on the results of the survey
conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 61. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Department of Revenue
Services, in consultation with the Office of Policy Management, shall
study the expansion of the human capital investment tax credit
established pursuant to section 12-217x of the general statutes. Such
study shall include, but need not be limited to, the revenue impact from
(1) the expansion of the tax credit to include compensation paid to
interns by employers in the state who earned a credential from Charter
Oak State College for the successful completion of the training course
on high quality internship programs offered pursuant to the provisions
of section 58 of this act, and (2) the inclusion of an affected business
entity, as defined in section 12-284b of the general statutes, to receive
such tax credit solely for compensation paid to interns, and not any
other expense that qualifies as a human capital investment, as defined
in section 12-217x of the general statutes, if such affected business entity
receives such credential from Charter Oak State College.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Department of Revenue
Services shall submit, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher education
and employment advancement a report on the results of the study
conducted pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 62. Section 12-81x of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The legislative body of any municipality may establish, by ordinance,
a program to abate all or a portion of the property taxes due with respect
to real property owned and occupied as the principal residence of the
surviving spouse or domestic partner of a police officer, firefighter or
Public Act No. 26-12 94 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
emergency medical technician who dies while in the performance of
such officer's, firefighter's or technician's duties. As used in this section,
"domestic partner" means an individual with whom a police officer,
firefighter or emergency medical technician maintained a domestic
partnership until such police officer, firefighter or emergency medical
technician's death, and "domestic partnership" means a partnership
between two individuals that (1) are eighteen years of age or older, (2)
are in a committed, intimate relationship with each other, (3) are not
married to anyone, (4) would not be prohibited from marrying each
other under the laws of the state, (5) reside together in a principal
residence, and (6) are each other's sole domestic partner. Any
municipality that establishes such a program may require a domestic
partner claiming such abatement to attest to the criteria described in
subdivisions (1) to (6), inclusive, of this section.
Sec. 63. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to review and make recommendations for legislation regarding
tax incentives and credits for volunteer firefighters in the state.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who is a representative of an organization representing firefighters in
the state;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
Public Act No. 26-12 95 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) The State Fire Administrator, or the administrator's designee; and
(8) The Commissioner of Revenue Services, or the commissioner's
designee.
(c) Any member of the working group appointed under subdivision
(1), (2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the working group shall be made not
later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The members appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives and president pro tempore of the Senate shall serve as
the chairpersons of the working group. Such chairpersons shall
schedule the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later
than sixty days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding shall serve as administrative staff of the working
group.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that
it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Sec. 64. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any
provision of title 26 of the general statutes, any food service
Public Act No. 26-12 96 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
establishment that is regulated pursuant to the Public Health Code may
sell to consumers any lobster greater than the Atlantic States Marine
Fisheries Commission's American Lobster Fishery Management Plan
Lobster Management Area 6 maximum legal length, as well as any
lobster that is less than the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries
Commission's American Lobster Fishery Management Plan Lobster
Management Area 6 minimum legal length, as defined in regulations
adopted pursuant to section 26-157c of the general statutes, provided:
(1) Such lobster is not taken from such Lobster Management Area 6
waters or landed in this state, regardless of where such lobsters were
taken, (2) such lobster is not greater than the maximum legal length or
less than the minimum legal length in effect for the applicable waters of
the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission's American Lobster
Fishery Management Plan Lobster Management Area, or the nation of
origin, as applicable, and (3) such food service establishment in
possession of such lobsters possesses a manifest, bill of landing, invoice,
purchase order or other written documentation that identifies the state,
lobster management area or nation of origin, as applicable, where such
lobster was received, and the number of such lobsters received. Such
documentation shall be retained by the food service establishment for a
period of six months from the date such lobsters were received by such
food service establishment and shall be made available to any law
enforcement officer upon request.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 26-157j of the general
statutes, any person licensed as a seafood dealer, pursuant to section 26-
142a of the general statutes, may sell to a food service establishment that
is regulated pursuant to the Public Health Code any such lobster, as
described in subsection (a) of this section, provided such lobster
complies with the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of said
subsection. Such seafood dealer shall provide to the purchasing food
service establishment, at the time of sale, the documentation described
in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section.
Public Act No. 26-12 97 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Sec. 65. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "First responder" means a police officer certified by the Police
Officer Standards and Training Council, volunteer or paid fire service
personnel certified by the Commission on Fire Prevention and Control
or emergency medical service personnel licensed or certified by the
Department of Public Health; and
(2) "Employer" for a police officer means the administrative head of a
law enforcement unit, as defined in section 7-291e of the general
statutes, for fire service personnel means the chief of a volunteer or paid
fire department and for emergency medical service personnel means the
chief administrator of a volunteer or municipal emergency medical
service organization, as defined in section 19a-175 of the general
statutes.
(b) Each first responder seeking to receive a tuition waiver pursuant
to section 10a-77 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or 10a-
99 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or mortgage assistance
pursuant to section 72 of this act shall request a compliance certification
from such first responder's employer, on a form developed by the
Comptroller pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, to certify that
such first responder meets the eligibility requirements, established
pursuant to section 7-294d of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, 7-323l of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or 19a-177 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, for such benefit. Such first
responder shall submit such compliance certification with such first
responder's application for a tuition waiver to the Connecticut State
Community College or the Connecticut State University System or
application for mortgage assistance to the Connecticut Housing Finance
Authority, as applicable.
(c) Not later than September 1, 2026, the Comptroller shall develop a
compliance certification form for an employer of a first responder to
Public Act No. 26-12 98 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
certify that such first responder meets the eligibility requirements,
established pursuant to sections 7-294d of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, 7-323l of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, and 19a-177 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, to
qualify for a tuition waiver or mortgage assistance program. The
Comptroller shall post such compliance certification form in a
conspicuous location on the Comptroller's Internet web site and
maintain each compliance certification submitted to the Comptroller for
the duration that such first responder receives such tuition waiver or
mortgage assistance. The Comptroller may share a copy of a compliance
certification, if requested by the first responder who is the subject of
such compliance certification, with such first responder, the Connecticut
State Community College, the Connecticut State University System, the
Connecticut Housing Finance Authority or the Department of Revenue
Services, as requested by such first responder.
(d) Upon the request of a first responder who is a volunteer or
employee, each employer shall complete a compliance certification form
if such first responder meets the eligibility requirements established
pursuant to section 7-294d of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, 7-323l of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or 19a-177 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, for a tuition waiver or
mortgage assistance program, as applicable. Such compliance
certification shall be sent to the first responder and a copy submitted to
the Comptroller in the manner prescribed by the Comptroller.
Sec. 66. Subsection (a) of section 7-294d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) The Police Officer Standards and Training Council shall have the
following powers:
(1) To develop and periodically update and revise comprehensive
Public Act No. 26-12 99 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
state and municipal police training plans;
(2) To approve, or revoke the approval of, any state or municipal
police training school and to issue certification to such schools and to
revoke such certification;
(3) To set the minimum courses of study and attendance required and
the equipment and facilities to be required of approved state and
municipal police training schools;
(4) To set the minimum qualifications for law enforcement instructors
and to issue appropriate certification to such instructors in the field of
expertise that such instructors will be teaching;
(5) To require that all probationary candidates receive the hours of
basic training deemed necessary before being eligible for certification,
such basic training to be completed within one year following the
appointment as a probationary candidate, unless the candidate is
granted additional time to complete such basic training by the council;
(6) To require the registration of probationary candidates with the
academy within ten days of hiring for the purpose of scheduling
training;
(7) To issue appropriate certification to police officers who have
satisfactorily completed minimum basic training programs;
(8) To require that each police officer satisfactorily complete at least
forty hours of certified review training every three years in order to
maintain certification, unless the officer is granted additional time not
to exceed one year to complete such training by the council;
(9) To develop an interactive electronic computer platform capable of
administering training courses and to authorize police officers to
complete certified review training at a local police department facility
Public Act No. 26-12 100 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
by means of such platform;
(10) To renew the certification of those police officers who have
satisfactorily completed review training programs and submitted to a
urinalysis drug test that screens for controlled substances, including,
but not limited to, anabolic steroids, the result of which indicated no
presence of any controlled substance not prescribed for the officer;
(11) To establish, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection, uniform minimum
educational and training standards for employment as a police officer
in full-time positions, temporary or probationary positions and part-
time or voluntary positions;
(12) To develop, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection, a schedule to visit and
inspect police basic training schools and to inspect each school at least
once each year;
(13) To consult with and cooperate with universities, colleges and
institutes for the development of specialized courses of study for police
officers in police science and police administration;
(14) To work with the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection and with departments and agencies of this state and
other states and the federal government concerned with police training;
(15) To make recommendations to the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection concerning a training academy
administrator, who shall be appointed by the commissioner, and
concerning the hiring of staff, within available appropriations, that may
be necessary in the performance of its functions;
(16) To perform any other acts that may be necessary and appropriate
to carry out the functions of the council as set forth in sections 7-294a to
Public Act No. 26-12 101 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
7-294e, inclusive;
(17) To accept, with the approval of the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection, contributions, grants, gifts, donations,
services or other financial assistance from any governmental unit, public
agency or the private sector;
(18) To conduct any inspection and evaluation that may be necessary
to determine if a law enforcement unit is complying with the provisions
of this section;
(19) At the request and expense of any law enforcement unit, to
conduct general or specific management surveys;
(20) To develop objective and uniform criteria for recommending any
waiver of regulations or granting a waiver of procedures established by
the council;
(21) To recruit, select and appoint candidates to the position of
municipal probationary candidate and provide recruit training for
candidates of the Connecticut Police Corps program in accordance with
the Police Corps Act, 42 USC 14091 et seq., as amended from time to
time;
(22) (A) To develop, adopt and revise, as necessary, comprehensive
accreditation standards, and designation of such standards as state-
accreditation tiers one, two and three, for the administration and
management of law enforcement units, to grant accreditation to those
law enforcement units that demonstrate their compliance with such
standards and, at the request and expense of any law enforcement unit,
to conduct such surveys as may be necessary to determine such unit's
compliance with such standards; and (B) on and after January 1, 2023 to
work with any law enforcement unit that has failed to obtain or
maintain its certification of compliance with the appropriate tier or tiers
or a higher level of accreditation standards developed by the council or
Public Act No. 26-12 102 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
the Commission on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc.,
pursuant to section 7-294ee;
(23) To recommend to the commissioner the appointment of any
council training instructor, or such other person as determined by the
council, to act as a special police officer throughout the state as such
instructor or other person's official duties may require, provided any
such instructor or other person so appointed shall be a certified police
officer. Each such special police officer shall be sworn and may arrest
and present before a competent authority any person for any offense
committed within the officer's precinct; [and]
(24) To develop and implement written policies, on or before January
1, 2021, in consultation with the Commissioner of Emergency Services
and Public Protection concerning the requirements that all police
officers undergo periodic behavioral health assessments as set forth in
section 7-291e. Such written policies shall, at a minimum, address (A)
the confidentiality of such assessments, including, but not limited to,
compliance with all provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended from time to time,
(B) the good faith reasons that the administrative head of a law
enforcement unit, as defined in section 7-291e, may rely upon when
requesting that a police officer undergo an additional assessment, (C)
the availability of behavioral health treatment services that will be
afforded to any police officer required to undergo a behavioral health
assessment pursuant to section 7-291e, (D) the ability of a police officer
to review and contest the results of any such assessment, (E) permissible
personnel actions, if any, that may be taken by a law enforcement unit
based on the results of such assessments while taking into consideration
the due process rights of a police officer, (F) the process for selecting
psychiatrists and psychologists to conduct such assessments, and (G)
financial considerations that may be incurred by law enforcement units
or police officers that are attributable to conducting such assessments;
Public Act No. 26-12 103 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(25) To establish eligibility requirements, on or before January 1, 2027,
for police officers to receive a tuition waiver from the Connecticut State
Community College pursuant to section 10a-77, as amended by this act,
or the Connecticut State University System pursuant to section 10a-99,
as amended by this act. Such eligibility requirements shall include, but
need not be limited to, (A) certification as a police officer by the council,
and (B) current employment with a law enforcement unit in the state for
at least two years, but not more than five years, as specified by the
council; and
(26) To establish eligibility requirements, on or before January 1, 2027,
for police officers to receive mortgage assistance through a mortgage
assistance program developed by the Connecticut Housing Finance
Authority pursuant to section 72 of this act. Such eligibility
requirements shall include, but need not be limited to, (A) certification
as a police officer by the council, and (B) current employment with a law
enforcement unit in the state for at least two years, but not more than
five years, as specified by the council.
Sec. 67. Subsection (a) of section 7-323l of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The [commission] Commission of Fire Prevention and Control
shall:
(1) Recommend minimum standards of education and physical
condition for candidates for any firefighter position;
(2) Establish standards for fire service training and education
programs, and develop and conduct an examination program to certify
those fire service personnel who satisfactorily demonstrate their ability
to meet the requirements of the fire service training and education
program standards;
Public Act No. 26-12 104 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(3) Establish an optional fire service training and education program
that provides information relative to the blue envelopes designed
pursuant to section 14-11j and yellow envelopes designed pursuant to
section 14-11l and techniques for the handling of incidents, such as
wandering, that involve juveniles and adults with autism spectrum
disorder, cognitive impairment or nonverbal learning disorder,
provided the curriculum for such techniques is made available at no cost
from (A) institutions of higher education, health care professionals or
advocacy organizations that are concerned with juveniles and adults
with autism spectrum disorder, cognitive impairment or nonverbal
learning disorder, or (B) collaborations of such institutions,
professionals or organizations;
(4) Conduct fire fighting training and education programs designed
to assist firefighters in developing and maintaining their skills and
keeping abreast of technological advances in fire suppression, fire
protection, fire prevention and related fields;
(5) Recommend standards for promotion to the various ranks of fire
departments;
(6) Be authorized, with the approval of the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection, to apply for, receive and
distribute any state, federal or private funds or contributions available
for training and education of fire fighting personnel;
(7) Recommend that the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection approve or reject the establishment of, or, when
appropriate, suspend or revoke the approval of, regional fire schools in
accordance with section 7-323u;
(8) Advise the Division of Fire Services Administration within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection on the
management of the Statewide Fire Service Disaster Response Plan;
Public Act No. 26-12 105 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(9) Implement the recommendations of the study of the fire service
authorized pursuant to subdivision (36) of subsection (b) of section 41
of public act 23-204; [and]
(10) Submit to the Governor, the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
and security, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, and the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection an annual
report (A) relating to the activities, recommendations and
accomplishments of the commission, and (B) making recommendations
on the funding necessary for the operation of, the maintenance of and
capital improvements to the state fire school and regional fire schools;
(11) Establish eligibility requirements, on or before January 1, 2027,
for firefighters, as defined in section 7-323j, including, but not limited to,
firefighters serving a fire department operated by a federally recognized
Indian tribe in the state, to receive a tuition waiver from the Connecticut
State Community College pursuant to section 10a-77, as amended by
this act, or the Connecticut State University System pursuant to section
10a-99, as amended by this act. Such eligibility requirements shall
include, but need not be limited to, (A) certification as fire service
personnel by the commission, and (B) current employment with a fire
department in the state for at least two years, but not more than five
years, as specified by the commission; and
(12) Establish eligibility requirements, on or before January 1, 2027,
for firefighters, as defined in section 7-323j, to receive mortgage
assistance through a mortgage assistance program developed by the
Connecticut Housing Finance Authority pursuant to section 72 of this
act. Such eligibility requirements shall include, but need not be limited
to, (A) certification as fire service personnel by the commission, and (B)
current employment with a fire department in the state for at least two
years, but not more than five years, as specified by the commission.
Public Act No. 26-12 106 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
Sec. 68. Section 19a-177 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The [commissioner] Commissioner of Public Health shall:
(1) With the advice of the Office of Emergency Medical Services
established pursuant to section 19a-178 and of an advisory committee
on emergency medical services and with the benefit of meetings held
pursuant to subsection (b) of section 19a-184, adopt every five years a
state-wide plan for the coordinated delivery of emergency medical
services;
(2) License or certify the following: (A) Ambulance operations,
emergency medical services personnel and communications personnel;
(B) emergency room facilities and communications facilities; and (C)
transportation equipment, including land, sea and air vehicles used for
transportation of patients to emergency facilities and periodically
inspect life saving equipment, emergency facilities and emergency
transportation vehicles to ensure state standards are maintained;
(3) Annually inventory emergency medical services resources within
the state, including facilities, equipment, and personnel, for the
purposes of determining the need for additional services and the
effectiveness of existing services;
(4) Review and evaluate all area-wide plans developed by the
emergency medical services councils pursuant to section 19a-182 in
order to insure conformity with standards issued by the commissioner;
(5) Not later than thirty days after their receipt, review all grant and
contract applications for federal or state funds concerning emergency
medical services or related activities for conformity to policy guidelines
and forward such application to the appropriate agency, when required;
(6) Establish such minimum standards and adopt such regulations in
Public Act No. 26-12 107 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, as may be necessary to
develop the following components of an emergency medical service
system: (A) Communications, which shall include, but not be limited to,
equipment, radio frequencies and operational procedures; (B)
transportation services, which shall include, but not be limited to,
vehicle type, design, condition and maintenance, and operational
procedures; (C) training, which shall include, but not be limited to,
emergency medical services personnel, communications personnel,
paraprofessionals associated with emergency medical services,
firefighters and state and local police; (D) emergency medical service
facilities, which shall include, but not be limited to, categorization of
emergency departments as to their treatment capabilities and ancillary
services; and (E) mobile integrated health care programs, which shall
include, but not be limited to, the standards to ensure the health, safety
and welfare of the patients being served by such programs and data
collection and reporting requirements to ensure and measure quality
outcomes of such programs;
(7) Coordinate training of all emergency medical services personnel;
(8) (A) Develop an emergency medical services data collection
system. Each emergency medical service organization licensed or
certified pursuant to this chapter shall submit data to the commissioner,
on a quarterly basis, from each licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service that provides
emergency medical services. Such submitted data shall include, but not
be limited to: (i) The total number of and reasons for calls for emergency
medical services received by such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service through the 9-1-1
system during the reporting period; (ii) each level of emergency medical
services, as defined in regulations adopted pursuant to section 19a-179,
required for each such call; (iii) the response time for each licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
Public Act No. 26-12 108 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
service during the reporting period; (iv) the number of passed calls,
cancelled calls and mutual aid calls, both made and received, during the
reporting period; and (v) for the reporting period, the prehospital data
for the nonscheduled transport of patients required by regulations
adopted pursuant to subdivision (6) of this section. The data required
under this subdivision may be submitted in any electronic form selected
by such licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service and approved by the commissioner,
provided the commissioner shall take into consideration the needs of
such licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service in approving such electronic form. The
commissioner may conduct an audit of any such licensed ambulance
service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept service as
the commissioner deems necessary in order to verify the accuracy of
such reported data.
(B) On or before June 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall prepare a report to the Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Board, established pursuant to section 19a-178a, that shall
include, but not be limited to, the following data: (i) The total number
of calls for emergency medical services received during the reporting
year by each licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service; (ii) the level of emergency medical services
required for each such call; (iii) the name of the emergency medical
service organization that provided each such level of emergency
medical services furnished during the reporting year; (iv) the response
time, by time ranges or fractile response times, for each licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service, using a common definition of response time, as provided in
regulations adopted pursuant to section 19a-179; (v) the number of
passed calls, cancelled calls and mutual aid calls during the reporting
year; and (vi) any shortage of emergency medical services personnel in
the state. The commissioner shall prepare such report in a format that
Public Act No. 26-12 109 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
categorizes such data for each municipality in which the emergency
medical services were provided, with each such municipality grouped
according to urban, suburban and rural classifications.
(C) If any licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service does not submit the data required under
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision for a period of six consecutive
months, or if the commissioner believes that such licensed ambulance
service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept service
knowingly or intentionally submitted incomplete or false data, the
commissioner shall issue a written order directing such licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service to comply with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision and submit all missing data or such corrected data as the
commissioner may require. If such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service fails to fully comply
with such order not later than three months from the date such order is
issued, the commissioner (i) shall conduct a hearing, in accordance with
chapter 54, at which such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service shall be required to
show cause why the primary service area assignment of such licensed
ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic intercept
service should not be revoked, and (ii) may take such disciplinary action
under section 19a-17 as the commissioner deems appropriate.
(D) The commissioner shall collect the data required by
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, in the manner provided in said
subparagraph, from each emergency medical service organization
licensed or certified pursuant to this chapter. Any such emergency
medical service organization that fails to comply with the provisions of
this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred
dollars per day for each failure to report the required data regarding
emergency medical services provided to a patient, as determined by the
Public Act No. 26-12 110 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
commissioner. The civil penalties set forth in this subparagraph shall be
assessed only after the department provides a written notice of
deficiency and the organization is afforded the opportunity to respond
to such notice. An organization shall have not more than fifteen business
days after the date of receiving such notice to provide a written response
to the department. The commissioner may adopt regulations, in
accordance with chapter 54, concerning the development,
implementation, monitoring and collection of emergency medical
service system data. All state agencies licensed or certified as emergency
medical service organizations shall be exempt from the civil penalties
set forth in this subparagraph.
(E) The commissioner shall, with the recommendation of the
Connecticut Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board established
pursuant to section 19a-178a, adopt for use in trauma data collection the
most recent version of the National Trauma Data Bank's National
Trauma Data Standards and Data Dictionary and nationally recognized
guidelines for field triage of injured patients.
(F) On or before June 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall submit the report described in subparagraph (B) of
this subdivision, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to public health;
(9) (A) Establish rates for the conveyance and treatment of patients
by licensed ambulance services and invalid coaches and establish
emergency service rates for certified ambulance services and paramedic
intercept services, provided (i) the present rates established for such
services and vehicles shall remain in effect until such time as the
commissioner establishes a new rate schedule as provided in this
subdivision, and (ii) any rate increase not in excess of the Medical Care
Services Consumer Price Index, as published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, for the prior year,
Public Act No. 26-12 111 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
filed in accordance with subparagraph (B)(iii) of this subdivision shall
be deemed approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this
subdivision, licensed ambulance services and paramedic intercept
services shall not include emergency air transport services or mobile
integrated health care programs.
(B) Adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
54, establishing methods for setting rates and conditions for charging
such rates. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited to,
provisions requiring that on and after July 1, 2000: (i) Requests for rate
increases may be filed no more frequently than once a year, except that,
in any case where an agency's schedule of maximum allowable rates
falls below that of the Medicare allowable rates for that agency, the
commissioner shall immediately amend such schedule so that the rates
are at or above the Medicare allowable rates; (ii) only licensed
ambulance services, certified ambulance services and paramedic
intercept services that apply for a rate increase in excess of the Medical
Care Services Consumer Price Index, as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, for the prior
year, and do not accept the maximum allowable rates contained in any
voluntary state-wide rate schedule established by the commissioner for
the rate application year shall be required to file detailed financial
information with the commissioner, provided any hearing that the
commissioner may hold concerning such application shall be conducted
as a contested case in accordance with chapter 54; (iii) licensed
ambulance services, certified ambulance services and paramedic
intercept services that do not apply for a rate increase in any year in
excess of the Medical Care Services Consumer Price Index, as published
by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor, for the prior year, or that accept the maximum allowable rates
contained in any voluntary state-wide rate schedule established by the
commissioner for the rate application year shall, not later than the last
business day in August of such year, file with the commissioner a
Public Act No. 26-12 112 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
statement of emergency and nonemergency call volume, and, in the case
of a licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or
paramedic intercept service that is not applying for a rate increase, a
written declaration by such licensed ambulance service, certified
ambulance service or paramedic intercept service that no change in its
currently approved maximum allowable rates will occur for the rate
application year; and (iv) detailed financial and operational information
filed by licensed ambulance services, certified ambulance services and
paramedic intercept services to support a request for a rate increase in
excess of the Medical Care Services Consumer Price Index, as published
by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor, for the prior year, shall cover the time period pertaining to the
most recently completed fiscal year and the rate application year of the
licensed ambulance service, certified ambulance service or paramedic
intercept service.
(C) Establish rates for licensed ambulance services, certified
ambulance services or paramedic intercept services for the following
services and conditions: (i) "Advanced life support assessment" and
"specialty care transports", which terms have the meanings provided in
42 CFR 414.605; and (ii) mileage, which may include mileage for an
ambulance transport when the point of origin and final destination for
a transport is within the boundaries of the same municipality. The rates
established by the commissioner for each such service or condition shall
be equal to (I) the ambulance service's base rate plus its established
advanced life support/paramedic surcharge when advanced life
support assessment services are performed; (II) two hundred twenty-
five per cent of the ambulance service's established base rate for
specialty care transports; and (III) "loaded mileage", as the term is
defined in 42 CFR 414.605, multiplied by the ambulance service's
established rate for mileage. Such rates shall remain in effect until such
time as the commissioner establishes a new rate schedule as provided
in this subdivision.
Public Act No. 26-12 113 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(D) Establish rates for the treatment and release of patients by a
licensed or certified emergency medical services organization or a
provider who does not transport such patients to an emergency
department and who is operating within the scope of such
organization's or provider's practice and following protocols approved
by the sponsor hospital. The rates established pursuant to this
subparagraph shall not apply to the treatment provided to patients
through mobile integrated health care programs;
(10) Establish primary service areas and assign in writing a primary
service area responder for each primary service area. Each state-owned
campus having an acute care hospital on the premises shall be
designated as the primary service area responder for that campus;
(11) Revoke primary service area assignments upon determination by
the commissioner that it is in the best interests of patient care to do so;
[and]
(12) Annually issue a list of minimum equipment requirements for
authorized emergency medical services vehicles based upon current
national standards. The commissioner shall distribute such list to all
emergency medical service organizations and sponsor hospital medical
directors and make such list available to other interested stakeholders.
Emergency medical service organizations shall have one year from the
date of issuance of such list to comply with the minimum equipment
requirements; and
(13) (A) Establish eligibility requirements, on or before January 1,
2027, in consultation with the Commission on Fire Prevention and
Control, for emergency medical service personnel to receive a tuition
waiver from the Connecticut State Community College pursuant to
section 10a-77, as amended by this act, or the Connecticut State
University System pursuant to section 10a-99, as amended by this act.
Such eligibility requirements shall include, but need not be limited to,
Public Act No. 26-12 114 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(i) license or certification as emergency medical service personnel by the
commissioner, and (ii) current employment with a municipal or
volunteer emergency medical service organization in the state for at
least two years, but not more than five years, as specified by the
commissioner;
(B) Establish eligibility requirements, on or before January 1, 2027, for
emergency medical service personnel to receive mortgage assistance
through a mortgage assistance program developed by the Connecticut
Housing Finance Authority pursuant to section 72 of this act. Such
eligibility requirements shall include, but need not be limited to, (i)
license or certification as emergency medical service personnel by the
commissioner, and (ii) current employment with a municipal or
volunteer emergency medical service organization in the state for at
least two years, but not more than five years, as specified by the
commissioner.
Sec. 69. Subsection (d) of section 10a-77 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(d) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall waive the
payment of tuition at the Connecticut State Community College (1) for
any dependent child of a person whom the armed forces of the United
States has declared to be missing in action or to have been a prisoner of
war while serving in such armed forces after January 1, 1960, which
child has been accepted for admission to said college and is a resident
of the state at the time such child is accepted for admission to said
college, (2) subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, for
any veteran, as defined in section 27-103, who performed service in time
of war, as defined in section 27-103, except that for purposes of this
subsection, "service in time of war" shall not include time spent in
attendance at a military service academy, which veteran has been
accepted for admission to said college and is domiciled in this state at
Public Act No. 26-12 115 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
the time such veteran is accepted for admission to said college. Said
board shall also waive for any such veteran the payment of any
extension fees under section 10a-26 for educational extension programs,
(3) for any resident of the state (A) sixty-two years of age or older, or (B)
who is a resident of a nursing home, as defined in section 19a-490, and
has maintained residency at such nursing home for not less than thirty
days, provided, at the end of the regular registration period, there are
enrolled in the course a sufficient number of students other than those
residents eligible for waivers pursuant to this subdivision to offer the
course in which such resident intends to enroll and there is space
available in such course after accommodating all such students, (4) for
any student attending the Connecticut State Police Academy who is
enrolled in a law enforcement program at said academy offered in
coordination with the Connecticut State Community College which
accredits courses taken in such program, (5) for any active member of
the Connecticut Army or Air National Guard who (A) has been certified
by the Adjutant General or such Adjutant General's designee as a
member in good standing of the guard, and (B) is enrolled or accepted
for admission to said college on a full-time or part-time basis in an
undergraduate degree-granting program. Said board shall also waive
for any such member the payment of any mandatory fees relating to
such member's enrollment in said college, including, but not limited to,
any extension fees under section 10a-26 for educational extension
programs, (6) for any dependent child of a (A) police officer, as defined
in section 7-294a, or supernumerary or auxiliary police officer, (B)
firefighter, as defined in section 7-323j, or member of a volunteer fire
company, (C) municipal employee, or (D) state employee, as defined in
section 5-154, killed in the line of duty, (7) for any resident of the state
who is a dependent child or surviving spouse of a specified terrorist
victim who was a resident of this state, (8) for any dependent child of a
resident of the state who was killed in a multivehicle crash at or near the
intersection of Routes 44 and 10 and Nod Road in Avon on July 29, 2005,
[and] (9) for any resident of the state who is a dependent child or
Public Act No. 26-12 116 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
surviving spouse of a person who was killed in action while performing
active military duty with the armed forces of the United States on or
after September 11, 2001, and who was a resident of this state, (10) for
any first responder, as defined in section 65 of this act, who (A) submits
a compliance certification pursuant to the provisions of section 65 of this
act, and (B) is enrolled or accepted for admission to said college, and (11)
for any student attending the state fire school who is enrolled in a
program at said school offered in coordination with Connecticut State
Community College that accredits courses taken in such program,
provided tuition waivers issued pursuant to subdivisions (10) and (11)
of this subsection shall be limited to two hundred eligible persons per
academic year. If any person who receives a tuition waiver in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection also receives
educational reimbursement from an employer, such waiver shall be
reduced by the amount of such educational reimbursement. Veterans
and members of the National Guard described in subdivision (5) of this
subsection shall be given the same status as students not receiving
tuition waivers in registering for courses at the Connecticut State
Community College. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30,
as used in this subsection, "domiciled in this state" includes domicile for
less than one year.
Sec. 70. Subsection (d) of section 10a-99 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(d) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall waive the
payment of tuition fees for undergraduate and graduate degree
programs at the Connecticut State University System (1) for any
dependent child of a person whom the armed forces of the United States
has declared to be missing in action or to have been a prisoner of war
while serving in such armed forces after January 1, 1960, which child
has been accepted for admission to such institution and is a resident of
Public Act No. 26-12 117 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
the state at the time such child is accepted for admission to such
institution, (2) subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section,
for any veteran, as defined in section 27-103, who performed service in
time of war, as defined in section 27-103, except that for purposes of this
subsection, "service in time of war" shall not include time spent in
attendance at a military service academy, which veteran has been
accepted for admission to such institution and is domiciled in this state
at the time such veteran is accepted for admission to such institution.
Said board shall also waive for any such veteran the payment of any
extension fees under section 10a-26 for educational extension programs,
(3) for any resident of the state sixty-two years of age or older who has
been accepted for admission to such institution, provided (A) such
resident is enrolled in a degree-granting program, or (B) at the end of
the regular registration period, there are enrolled in the course a
sufficient number of students other than those residents eligible for
waivers pursuant to this subdivision to offer the course in which such
resident intends to enroll and there is space available in such course
after accommodating all such students, (4) for any student attending the
Connecticut Police Academy who is enrolled in a law enforcement
program at said academy offered in coordination with [the] a university
which accredits courses taken in such program, (5) for any active
member of the Connecticut Army or Air National Guard who (A) has
been certified by the Adjutant General or such Adjutant General's
designee as a member in good standing of the guard, and (B) is enrolled
or accepted for admission to such institution on a full-time or part-time
basis in an undergraduate or graduate degree-granting program. Said
board shall also waive for any such member the payment of any
mandatory fees relating to such member's enrollment in such
institution, including, but not limited to, any extension fees under
section 10a-26 for educational extension programs, (6) for any
dependent child of a (A) police officer, as defined in section 7-294a, or
supernumerary or auxiliary police officer, (B) firefighter, as defined in
section 7-323j, or member of a volunteer fire company, (C) municipal
Public Act No. 26-12 118 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
employee, or (D) state employee, as defined in section 5-154, killed in
the line of duty, (7) for any resident of this state who is a dependent
child or surviving spouse of a specified terrorist victim who was a
resident of the state, (8) for any dependent child of a resident of the state
who was killed in a multivehicle crash at or near the intersection of
Routes 44 and 10 and Nod Road in Avon on July 29, 2005, [and] (9) for
any resident of the state who is a dependent child or surviving spouse
of a person who was killed in action while performing active military
duty with the armed forces of the United States on or after September
11, 2001, and who was a resident of this state, (10) for any first
responder, as defined in section 65 of this act, who (A) submits a
compliance certification pursuant to the provisions of section 65 of this
act, and (B) is enrolled or accepted for admission to such institution, and
(11) for any student attending the state fire school who is enrolled in a
program at said school offered in coordination with a university that
accredits courses taken in such program, provided tuition waivers
issued pursuant to subdivisions (10) and (11) of this subsection shall be
limited to two hundred eligible persons per academic year. If any person
who receives a tuition waiver in accordance with the provisions of this
subsection also receives educational reimbursement from an employer,
such waiver shall be reduced by the amount of such educational
reimbursement. Veterans and members of the National Guard
described in subdivision (5) of this subsection shall be given the same
status as students not receiving tuition waivers in registering for courses
at Connecticut state universities. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10a-30, as used in this subsection, "domiciled in this state"
includes domicile for less than one year.
Sec. 71. Subsection (e) of section 10a-105 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(e) Said board of trustees shall waive the payment of tuition fees for
Public Act No. 26-12 119 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
any undergraduate or graduate degree program at The University of
Connecticut (1) for any dependent child of a person whom the armed
forces of the United States has declared to be missing in action or to have
been a prisoner of war while serving in such armed forces after January
1, 1960, which child has been accepted for admission to The University
of Connecticut and is a resident of the state at the time such child is
accepted for admission to said institution, (2) subject to the provisions
of subsection (f) of this section, for any veteran, as defined in section 27-
103, who performed service in time of war, as defined in section 27-103,
except that for purposes of this subsection, "service in time of war" shall
not include time spent in attendance at a military service academy,
which veteran has been accepted for admission to said institution and is
domiciled in this state at the time such veteran is accepted for admission
to said institution. Said board shall also waive for any such veteran the
payment of any extension fees under section 10a-26 for educational
extension programs, (3) for any resident of the state sixty-two years of
age or older who has been accepted for admission to said institution,
provided (A) such resident is enrolled in a degree-granting program, or
(B) at the end of the regular registration period, there are enrolled in the
course a sufficient number of students other than those residents eligible
for waivers pursuant to this subdivision to offer the course in which
such resident intends to enroll and there is space available in such
course after accommodating all such students, (4) for any active member
of the Connecticut Army or Air National Guard who (A) has been
certified by the Adjutant General or such Adjutant General's designee
as a member in good standing of the guard, and (B) is enrolled or
accepted for admission to said institution on a full-time or part-time
basis in an undergraduate or graduate degree-granting program. Said
board shall also waive for any such member the payment of any
mandatory fees relating to such member's enrollment in said institution,
including, but not limited to, any extension fees under section 10a-26 for
educational extension programs, (5) for any dependent child of a (A)
police officer, as defined in section 7-294a, or supernumerary or
Public Act No. 26-12 120 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
auxiliary police officer, (B) firefighter, as defined in section 7-323j, or
member of a volunteer fire company, (C) municipal employee, or (D)
state employee, as defined in section 5-154, killed in the line of duty, (6)
for any resident of the state who is the dependent child or surviving
spouse of a specified terrorist victim who was a resident of the state, (7)
for any dependent child of a resident of the state who was killed in a
multivehicle crash at or near the intersection of Routes 44 and 10 and
Nod Road in Avon on July 29, 2005, and (8) for any resident of the state
who is a dependent child or surviving spouse of a person who was
killed in action while performing active military duty with the armed
forces of the United States on or after September 11, 2001, and who was
a resident of this state. If any person who receives a tuition waiver in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection also receives
educational reimbursement from an employer, such waiver shall be
reduced by the amount of such educational reimbursement. Veterans
and members of the National Guard described in subdivision (4) of this
subsection shall be given the same status as students not receiving
tuition waivers in registering for courses at The University of
Connecticut. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30, as used
in this subsection, "domiciled in this state" includes domicile for less
than one year.
Sec. 72. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section,
"first responder" has the same meaning as provided in section 65 of this
act.
(b) The Connecticut Housing Finance Authority shall develop and
administer a program of mortgage assistance to first responders who
submit a compliance certification pursuant to the provisions of section
65 of this act as part of the application process to receive such mortgage
assistance. Such mortgage assistance shall be available to such first
responder under guidelines adopted by the authority for the purchase
of a home used as such first responder's principal residence in the
Public Act No. 26-12 121 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
community served by such first responder. In making mortgage
assistance available under the program, the authority may utilize down
payment assistance or any other appropriate housing subsidies. The
terms of any mortgage assistance may allow the mortgagee to realize a
reasonable portion of any equity gain upon sale of the mortgaged
property.
Sec. 73. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force to
study issues relating to the recruitment and retention of public safety
personnel. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, an
examination of the feasibility and fiscal impact of the state providing (1)
tuition waivers, mortgage assistance and tax credits to correction
officers and judicial marshals, (2) tuition waivers to the dependent
children of police officers, uniformed members of paid or volunteer fire
departments and emergency medical service personnel, (3) tuition
waivers for undergraduate and graduate degree programs at The
University of Connecticut to police officers, uniformed members of paid
or volunteer fire departments and emergency medical service
personnel, and (4) tuition vouchers to public safety personnel that can
be used at any accredited institution of higher education in the state.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who has expertise in public safety;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, who is
a representative of the University of New Haven and has expertise in
higher education;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
Public Act No. 26-12 122 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
or the commissioner's designee;
(8) The Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee;
and
(9) The Chief Court Administrator, or the administrator's designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
and security shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
safety and security, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
Public Act No. 26-12 123 of 124

Substitute House Bill No. 5003
submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Sec. 74. (Effective from passage) The Chief Workforce Officer shall
develop a plan for the establishment of a police officer and firefighter
career pipeline program that includes, but shall not be limited to: (1) A
strategy to increase the number of state residents pursuing careers as
police officers or firefighters, and (2) estimated funding needed to
support a police officer and firefighter career pipeline program. Not
later than January 1, 2027, the Chief Workforce Officer shall submit a
report on the plan, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of
the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
labor and public employees.
Sec. 75. Section 10-236a of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
October 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved May 11, 2026
Public Act No. 26-12 124 of 124